Les nopos as a social construct were first brought to my attention by my good friend, the ever stylish Esther Loonen. As well as being one of Paris' most celebrated new children's fashion designers (Lili And The Funky Boys), Esther and her hubby, Jules are the Showgirl's and mine partners in newly impoverished Parisian crime. Despite the ever present spectre of financial disaster, we forge ahead, eating at a restaurant here, organising a modest little European mini-break there. It's not exactly Marie-Antoinette, let-them-eat-cake excess (that's the exclusive preserve of people who actually do have money to fall back on, and besides, our deeply instilled Protestant work ethic would never allow for that kind of completely irresponsible behaviour), but there is a certain cavalier fatalism to it all.
Nato supply convoys travelling through Pakistan to Afghanistan have regularly come under attack in the past, but following Pakistan’s decision to block their route through the Khyber Pass, they now face an even bigger security threat.
Imtithal: (wailing and overly emotional) Oh my poor ladies! How cruel was he to you? Did he shout disrespectful words at you, our young ladies?
Blaine Kern is the self-proclaimed "Mr. Mardi Gras" and biggest float manufacturer in the world. His warehouse is open to the public and showcases the larger-than-life props used on Mardi Gras parade floats.
Bottom left ... 'Blackberry Jack' and 'Francois Verheart'.
(What commercial is that from? I can hear it in my head as clear as a bell, but can't for the life of me come up with what the commercial is for.)
The saying goes the way to a man's heart is through his stomach, it's the same for me, except you need to reach my stomach via a different route.
On the other hand, the Neo-Catholic Conservatives also notice the obvious contradictions, but unlike the sedevacantists, they refuse to deny the reality that is right before them, namely, that there is, in fact, a pope and bishops. In this way, their position is more reasonable. However, they also make the Magisterium into an absolute reality that must be obeyed down to the smallest letter, even in the face of the obvious contradictions. In order to reconcile the contradictions, the Neo-Catholic Conservative must rely on endlessly interpreting both the former Magisterium and the present Magisterium. The faith is, at best, reduced to doctrinal syllogisms, all the more ludicrous because these syllogisms completely ignore the law of non-contradiction. At worst, the faith is reduced to meaningless rhetorical sophistry, and there are many examples of this in the modern Church.
The following is a guest post by Esther Francis Joseph.
Charles Oputa popularly known as Charly Boy is one controversial character that you can’t ignore any day. From his weird lifestyle to independent mind, the Area Father has won for himself thousands of admirers across Nigeria. In a recent interview, he talked about his love life and many other “dirty” stuff. See a brief excerpt of the ‘controversial’ interview below: “First, I thank God for His mercies. It has not been easy one bit, but this much should be said. If two people with mutual respect, friendship and love are determined to make a union work, it will work. “Don’t also forget that I have picked up experience after having gone through almost four marriages in less than eight years. So, I think these are some of the factors that helped me in this one. “Women are all the same, no matter where they are from. You must study their manual if you are to live in peace with them.
Kammi Altig, Communications Manager
when I didnt
Here are some highlights:
I remember it like it was yesterday when that asshat, Mike, told me that my hair was disgusting and looked like a rat’s nest, and I spent my lunch break in the bathroom crying like Moaning Myrtle.
We all do this, we fall in love with a character on television or a movie and for some reason or another we begin to think the actors act like this in their everyday lives. Or we read a story written by someone we know and just because of a few similarities we put their face in our minds as we read. I really don’t want people to do that where my book is concerned so I am begging people who know me, especially those who don’t know me very well, not to buy it for fear that my hard-earned reputation as a level-headed normal human being will be destroyed forever.
As we passed rolling hill after rolling hill with its wide variety of wind machines, I noticed some of the turbines were merrily whirling along catching the breeze. Then there were some windmills struggling and moving slightly. Other turbines were stopped dead in their tracks; waiting!
1 tsp minced peeled fresh ginger
12:08 p.m. — Removed grain bag and let drain and then discarded the grain on the compost pile. Added the wort from the first pot. Measured out 5 pounds 6.4 ounces of Marris Otter LME and added it to the pot and stirred to dissolve. Resulting in 3.75 gallons in my brew pot.
It became a comfort to know that every year, we got to open one present and that one present would always be a pair of new pajamas. And my mom still gets my brother and I new pajamas, but she also gets them for my Hubby and my sister-in-law and now my kids. These are the kids jammies from last year:
back then...
I'm overwhelmed with thankfulness for my marriage and my children. I'm in humble amazement at the healing and fulfilling God has allowed me to experience and witness.
The worst part is that I miss my friend. I miss talking to him every day. When we were friends we didn’t talk a ton, but we had our occasional, nice conversations. I don’t think we’ll ever get back to that point and that feels so awful. I should be happy, I’m moving in three weeks, I should be thrilled at the fresh start and all I can think about is the fact that I’m never going to see him again in my life. That hurts the most.
The show is at its best when we as viewers are implicated in the space. Mora’s work is close to what Bonsai accomplishes. His sculptures are pruned and kept as tight as possible, not being small just to be small, but expand the real space of the gallery and more importantly the gallery’s narrative space. When you are in front of a Mora sculpture, your eyes focus and you become bound up in a constructed moment with generous rewards.
Today we are looking at Acts 22:30.
For its suggestion of what dreams!
My orchid is in bloom again. No care about short daylight, freezing temperatures outdoors, the forgetful owner. Amazing power of life. And source of inspiration.
As for me, well I probably could have done without all the sugar, but I caved in and had a coffee shake...YUM! :) Doesn't that look soooo good?!?! Let me tell you, it sure was! :) As I sat there watching my kids, I started thinking about how time is just going by so quickly! Just 6 years ago, my eldest was still in grade school. Here is a picture I found of us taken on Mother's Day 2006.
Last night (because this was a story I had to share as soon as I heard it), my friend--who doesn't play Starcraft himself but watches it--contended that this counts as a spectator sport in the same way you'd watch someone play, say, baseball. I said no. Anything where you can sit down the whole time doesn't count as a sport. My friend shot back with 'What about NASCAR' (also not a sport IMO) and 'It's watching guys compete with mental and physical skill,' so, whatever, I think there's something to be said for at least covering some physical distance, but whatever, I'll concede the point. Moral of the story is: people watch Starcraft the way you'd watch sports.
Responding to this shift in consumer behavior, organizations are gearing up with their digital initiatives. Many research companies claim that more than 90% of companies are shifting from traditional investment to digital ones and I would second that!
This book proves that truth is stranger than fiction! I loved reading about women's side of history, and not just the boxed-in views of women that history books teach us. These women are real, flaws and all.
I started out this post meaning to be funny, and I end up so timid and serious. Perhaps this is why I don't write so often. I am in awe of those of you who write so well about your feelings, whose words are their honest hearts. I am going to end this here, where there is no ending, so I can go to the library and go to the grocery store and cook the food and go to work, but I am going to post it anyway, neatly done or not. To post and hope that I will write more, I will be a part of your brave circle. I hope you all are warm today. When I come home tonight I'll read your words and worry about you and smile with you and we will all crave spring, and that will take the edge off my foolish little loneliness.
In 2006, the inaugural American Craft Beer Week was recognized by the U.S. Congress with House Resolution 753. Since then, the week has continued to attract interest and support from beer enthusiasts and media with more than 180 breweries formally participating in 2008.
"Alright, you da boss. Anyway, common you gonna play yer hand or what?" answered the brown haired man.
Limb after limb
There are Wilkes originals as well as several fresh takes on traditional tunes like "Wayfaring Stranger and "Single Girl."
I reminded B that if we ever do find drugs, or he ever steals from us (which he never has) he's gone. He looked so shaken, and I believe that he knows he's very lucky to live with us.
Isn’t that just like human nature?
Jessie will graduate Saturday with a bachelor’s degree in integrated science and technology with concentrations in energy and the environment.
1 x KSGZ03-318-140-RED / 37 / air = 42.00
“All my life, I dreamed about such a truck,” he said. “My wife said, ‘O.K., you can buy it.’ You know, the wife makes all the decisions.”
I’ve loved that verse since I was a little girl. When we trust in God we find hope and strength. It’s such a powerful message.
"Yup," Denise angled her charge's Dora umbrella down to shade her own face from the sun. "The two of them came around the playground on the Upper West Side where I worked with a notepad and pen asking all the babysitters a bunch of questions. Said they went to NYU and they were working on a book report. And don't you know sitters recognize themselves in that story? So, you never know, my dear."
The most powerful tool in their toolkit is the development of Best Practices in Fair Use for various communities (there are guides for documentary filmmakers, media literacy educators, and more -- including, most recently and excitingly, a guide for Academic and Research Libraries). These codes help ordinary users interpret the law as it applies to scenarios and best practices in their specific community. While it isn't a free pass to do whatever you want, these best practices documents have stood up in court and helped guide legal decisions that are fair to copyright owners and those who want to freely use copyrighted material in their work.
And that is how it happens that I find myself attending to some poetry slam at a house of somebody I met through the internet, with people that I had never (ever) seen IRL.
7. Gap Curvy Jeans (Gap 2008)
It is a real shame that F1 is a sport that has been taken off air to sports fans and made pay to view to those who can afford sports packages :-(.
It was reported that some had one room and others more. Some had carpets inside and whitewash outside. They had chimneys coming out of the top of the creek bank and some had a porch. They were cool in summer and well protected in winter.
Next week I will be completely redecorating a dear friend's house. I can't wait to share before and after pictures with you all! I am really looking forward to it!!
From my observations over the last couple of months...there are three categories of people involved.
hope everyone had a great thanksgiving!
6) We teach worldview through curriculum.
Here's what I cooked up with the sketch:
c. a true world: this is the most amazing trick and attack that has ever been perpetrated upon us; so much has become encrusted in the word "true," and involuntarily we make a present of all this to the "true world": the true world must also be a truthful world, one that does not deceive us, does not make fools of us: to believe in it is virtually to be compelled to believe in it (--out of decency, as is the case among people worthy of confidence--).
· National High Speed Rail Authority to be set-up.
When you move as much as we do adding another piece of furniture to the mix is never that appealing. When we do add it is usually from ebay and we put it back on ebay when we move ... but alas after watching ebay for some weeks nothing really showed. Then the Super Amart catalogue hit the letterbox. God bless Amart.
thursday in photos:
The Corporation, based on The Corporation: The Pathological Pursuit of Profit and Power shows the development of the contemporary business corporation, from a legal entity that originated as a government-chartered institution meant to effect specific public functions, to the rise of the modern commercial institution entitled to most of the legal rights of a person.
Bruin Family, indeed. Prospective students, the Bruin Family plays April Fools’ jokes by mistake ten days too late. They take dumps on your heart and attribute it to “human error”. Exactly. They let a Bruin send the email.
I've actually just created a new playlist this week! It contains Bon Iver, City And Colour, Foster The People, Empire of The Sun, the new Florence album, and I still need to add the new Birdy album to it!
In the next instalment we will begin our journey into the strange landscape that is the fantastic realm of the heraldic imagination and art.
‘No point saying pigs can’t fly when they’re up there catching pigeons.’
Do you ever feel like you are reliving a moment in time over and over again? This is the third time I have had to say significant goodbyes and the last few friends are always the hardest because they are the ones that are closest. The ones who are there sharing the watershed with you as you say goodbye..thinking of all those special times you have had, thinking of how easy it has been to just pick up the phone, meet for coffee, lunch, dinner...all those things we take for granted until we know they are coming to the end. My daughters and I plodded onto our flight puffy eyed and a bit worse for wear this morning. They managed to do it in style and dawned the big sunglasses....and I just blew my nose and carried on with my pack of tissues close at hand. I think back to our first transfer in 1986 and the years that followed...waiting by the post for news from friends back home. As time went by the news came thru less and less but now...a whole new world has opened up to us. I am heavy hearted and weary yet optimistic because I know within a few days we will be texting, chatting on Facebook, blogging and sharing news of our holiday gatherings. My friends in Auckland will join the friends from other countries and the network will grow. What is encouraging for me is knowing that I will see them all again and when we do I will have picked up the phone, arranged to meet for coffee, lunch or dinner and it will be like time stood still for us all. They are those special friends that no matter where you are or how much time goes by we will always be there for each other. With that thought..I smile and look forward to seeing them again, soon :)
Failing, I compose
1 calmed
Now...To refresh your memory, here are all the outfits together. You can click to embiggen them, and click on the dates to go to the original posts.
2010.08.07 Afghanistan Nuristan 10 0 Ten members of a medical team, including Christian doctors, are pulled out of their cars and executed by devout Muslim fundamentalists, who spare an Afghan able to recite the Quran.
Our thanks to Malcolm for another superb presentation (he seems to be becoming a regular guest speaker).
Sure enough, 42% of the 128 surveyed CEOs said they expect that employment will go up.
one of my favorite country artists is eric church. i think he has such a sexy voice and all of his songs are about having a good time and getting into a little trouble. his look is a little different then all those other country crooners, but his talent and voice rise far above the competition.
To kindle the immortal fires!
I am sure I will wrap up my thoughts on the Great Lent Experiment next week, but here is what I have to say about the no-stress week: it was stressful.
After a few weeks of, ahem, lower-brow Friday Fives, today I’m diving deep and assigning you some “stretchy” reading to stretch your minds. These five books cover every broad scientific and humanistic field, to some degree, and all are quite well written and accessible to “inquiring minds”. If reality TV and standard election year “he said, she said” mumbo jumbo finds you wanting, you just might find some magic in these books.
Last weekend my family went for a couple of much needed days of camping on beautiful Lake Michigan. We spent a couple afternoons sitting by the beach playing in the sand and swimming. As I watched my kids build sand castles, my thoughts traveled back to this “new thinking”series of blog posts.
Brooklyner-Schneider Hopfen-Weisse: 3.31 Mugs
* Spirituality in Art, Dance and/or Music
The economy was at a nadir,
Make Thy work our ceaseless prayer. (Father, Hear the Prayer We Offer, Love M. Willis).
Then, she said ( and I wasn't expecting THIS ),
You know who can’t match that? Geek goddess Winona Ryder, that’s who. I know what you’re thinking. You’re thinking, “Dude, her first two movies were Lucas and Beetlejuice.” If that were true, I’d agree with you, but you’re forgetting about a little movie called Square Dance, which I’m guessing is not nearly as cool as any other film we’re talking about because it’s about a teenaged girl who moves to the city and plays pretend marriage with a mentally handicapped boy.
So... what do you do around here to stave off the... self harm? - The Doctor
Of course, the debit card is comparing the original wheel to a modern automobile – it’s still used everywhere, but the lengths to which we’ve stretched such technology is going to be what makes up our future. While many consumers hate the idea that it’s the major companies that have pioneered and mainstreamed such capabilities, I am far more in favour. MasterCard, Visa and Interac – these are the three majors that have owned the cashless consumer market; however in my eyes, the shape of things to come can be credited to PayPal. Obviously this has been a great idea from the start – a way of buying online without sharing credit card information – but they’ve evolved even further beyond buyer protection. Being able to pay directly from your bank account and sending money to anyone who’s on the internet is great, but then there’s this:
I don't often get a chance to listen to the radio because I'm always either working or busy with kids. However, on occasion for work I will find myself in the car on a Saturday morning and when I am I love tuning into John Tesh.
I did think later that perhaps I looked like a ninja with my balaclava and all in black…but I suppose if I’d been ninja like, I would have wooshed past her and she would have never noticed.
Next, I failed to place in (3) the Autumn 2011 Flash500 competition, (4) the Spilling Ink Short Story competition, (5) The New Writer short fiction competition, and (6) The Willesden Herald short story competition. It's never fun having a story sink without trace in a competition. Although it's not quite as much of a slap in the face as an outright rejection, it still stings. The difference here, I think, is that I start to wonder about the mechanics of the competition. What goes on behind the scenes? Who actually reads the entries and chooses the shortlist to send to the judge? What if my entry got lost somewhere along the way? Generally, it's best not to dwell on such thoughts, if you can help it.
There I was feeling all self conscious about having an outfit shot taken in public, and that I, myself, could be accused of an act of public indecency daring to wear a pair of mini-shorts and a racer back vest at my age. Well I shouldn't have worried, because on this occasion I was well and truly upstaged! This is an open, fairly exposed public space which is used by families and they were interrupted not just by us taking these photos, but by two very young children running through the grass catching crickets, followed shortly later by their extended family and later an old couple walking their inquisitive dog! And all that everyone seems to do (couple included) is that very English thing of "keep calm and carry on". So we carried on taking photos - I was darned if I was going to allow blogus interruptus by sheer embarrassment to stop me getting my outfit shots. Can't say I don't show dedication to the cause.
4) Go for lunch at Michelin restaurants. It’s a wonder Parisian women are not grossly overweight. French cuisine is oh-so-yummy and yes, it’s often (if not mostly) due to the butter/cream included in the recipe. So it’s a pity to come to Paris without heading to one of the Michelin-starred or famed restaurants. Without busting your budget, go for lunch in these restaurants as opposed to dinner. With a reputation to upkeep, the lunch menus are often good and probably half the price of the dinner menu. We had the lunch menu at 3-star Pre-Catelan and it was a most divine experience.
The first thing you should know is this isn't an actual picture of my shopping cart. I wouldn't be caught dead buying anything as healthy as fat-free milk or celery (Janice, I didn't reach for the celery. - Inside joke).
If you are in a painful relationship, I am so sorry. God is faithful, lean into Him.
“Some of self, and some of Thee.”
wind
In June 1879 the Heaton section of Armstrong Park was opened by the Mayor Mr Alderman Thomas Robinson. This section amounting to 22 and a half acres was purchased from a Mr Addison Potter, at a cost of £12,562.10s.
SO, I'll be out of commission for several days at the least. I'll be back as soon as I can! In the meantime, please head to Kim's Blog for the beginning of the VIP Blog Hop -- you don't want to miss it, I promise!
I'm not going to buy thing because I might be able to make something from it because I never do. I'm not going to buy another tea set just because I like the idea of one day have a tea shop. I'm not going to buy another plate because I like it so much I want to lick it. I'm not going to buy another posy because they are my new craze.
The next day I did my last job for Bob, who gallantly provided me with a man who could stick his arm out of the window if I wished to turn left. Fortunately, the route was only six miles long and quite direct, so neither of us were required to perform any hand signals.
I have been feeling pretty good lately. I am nearing the end of my third week of working out and it feels really good to be active again. I think without exercising, those dreaded baby blues would creep in. For the most part, I don't think I am having much, if any, post-partum depression. There are times when I still struggle with things, especially when I hear about other people losing their babies or about little ones that are sick. But, I think that is to be expected. I think when you lose a child, hearing about others who are facing the same thing affects you differently than it does if you haven't suffered a loss.
“Støre has also insisted that Israel dismantle its security wall built in response to the wave of suicide bombings from the West Bank.”
As allowance of the investigation the participants drank a simplified corn starch way out and had blood samples, taken over the following 2 hour phase, to confront blood glucose and circulating insulin levels.
If we listen past that, we again find an album full of original ideas, competently written and performed. Variety is key, yet the guys know they need melodies and creative instrumental ideas to hold the listeners attention. And succeed, as everyone into progressive metal accepts numerous listens and not expects every track to be instant.
Sunday's Sendai International Half Marathon, late spring's most competitive, is also thinner than in past years but is making a welcome return after being cancelled following last year's disasters. Sub-60 Kenyan Mekubo Mogusu (Team Nissin Shokuhin) will face his university-era rival Daniel Gitau (Kenya/Team Fujitsu) and Beppu-Oita Mainichi Marathon winner Harun Njoroge (Kenya/Team Komori Corp.) up front, while the Japanese field includes popular marathoners Arata Fujiwara (Miki House) and Yuki Kawauchi (Saitama Pref.). The women's field suffers greatly from the withdrawal of marathon national record holder Mizuki Noguchi (Team Sysmex), leaving twins Hiroko and Yoko Miyauchi (Team Kyocera) the favorites alongside Noguchi's teammate Megumi Seike (Team Sysmex).
A copy will be winging its way to you once I've got them sewn, and pressed a bit. And found envelopes.
'Chipper' Dave is a widely followed beer blogger in Colorado. His work strikes me as a good deal more professional than the junk I post here at Beer Rant so I often go to his blog for newsy posts. I seem to recall it was at his site that I first became aware of the Beer Mapping Project. Some day I hope to cross paths with him when I visit Colorado, but in the meantime, it’s a pleasure to know that he drops in here from time to time.
You see, June is going to be a great month as I am going to be all over the place. Not as all over the place as I was in April, but pretty close. On the 31st May I am going home to Aurland (via Bergen) with Sunshine and Ping Pong, just to show them my beautiful village! They go back to London on the 7th June, but I am staying there till the 11th.
Four days after the fire, the fire marshal's report was issued and explained the cause of the fire: "Matches, which had been carelessly dropped on the floor in the several offices, had been swept up with the accumulation of dust and waste papers, all of which had been taken up and been placed in baskets, which were carried up to a closet located under the stairway leading to the top floor. These matches could have become ignited either by the friction caused in emptying the baskets or in being stepped on by parties handling the baskets."
it was too far away from me! The results will appear on the “events” tab at
and off we went.
Now, Alex is back to finish the job, and it's up to Hope to stop him. He's also ordered to make sure Hope and her mom never return. Hope swore she would risk anything to rescue her mom, and she’ll be damned if some lying douche is going to get in her way. She'll do whatever it takes, even if it means getting left behind.
Sending you lots of strength and smiles. Lx
SET @NbrOfMinutes = datediff(mi
and out loud.
Four walls, a safe structure,
Sunbathing is often a pleasurable experience, especially when the air is crisp or chilly. The three folks above were spotted when I arrived at Heartland Rabbit Rescue one cool morning. The wind was coming out of the north but they had found a perfect spot protected from the wind to catch a few rays. We human animals often forget that we don't own the planet, all of the children of the Earth have the same rights to the pleasures of living here as we do. But we forget this quite a lot.
And spill it on the floor!
Our first time zip lining was on our honeymoon in Jamaica. Funny enough, when we got there this time, we learned the same man built and owns this one in the gorge as well. Of all the zip lines in the world…. crazy!
This week's favourite I think has to be "men with hairy pubs".
I’ve previously written about the affordability of the SCG test. The, potentially, enormous cost of taking a family there. The great advantage that ANZ has it’s accessbility. Once the major event transport is activated for the game, your ticket covers your transport. Trains and buses virtually drop you off at the gate. It’s brilliant, and always seems to work very efficiently. I was travelling from work, west of Homebush on the train and was immediately struck but the number of families heading to the game – Mum, Dad and the kids out for a day at the cricket. No hassles about parking in Moore Park. No walks or slow bus trips from central. An almost door to door service. Not only is it easier, you don’t have the added expense. And, when you’ve spent money on 4 or 5 tickets for the family to head out – that’s a saving you’ll appreciate.
Not all of my greek yogurt creations have turned out though, just keepin' it real. Here's a picture of some crazy muffins I tried out in my blender using applesauce, oats, greek yogurt and cocoa powder among other strange ingredients. They were disgusting, but the picture was pretty cool... I'd hate for a pretty picture to go to waste.
While I'll appreciate further reports (and learn more on further visits), the food seems like good, if somewhat predictable, fare. I had a honey mustard chicken sandwich that was perfectly cooked, moist, and tender. Sally had pizza, which turned out to be thick crust--not to my personal taste. However, it is hand made and seemed like it might have been made with beer and is pretty tasty, particularly loaded, as it was, with tasty veggies.
5 Minutes Just For Me
Ruralshire Constabulary did not allow the flying of the St George’s flag over any of the rapidly decreasing number of properties owned by Ruralshire Police Authority.
Therefore, let us constantly perform our priestly duties
What does this mean? On most college and university campuses today, immodesty is ubiquitous and smokers are “in the closet”. But here there is no immodesty, and while smoking is not encouraged and few students smoke, smoking is quietly and charitably tolerated as it ought to be. Smoking, potentially, can harm the body; immodesty destroys the soul. How society ranks these two behaviors says everything about its priorities. In this small contrast, as in many others, TAC stands out as a little island of sanity.
Favorite Holiday- Birthday
So I thought I would share two bentos with you today. One I made before our broadcast last weekend at the Sonoma Marin Fair, and the other was a bento I brought to work with me yesterday. See if you can tell the difference...
The other element that makes this film so great is the editing. As the great Jim Emerson recently pointed out on his Scanners blog (he wonderfully titled his post: "Taut Editing, Stunning Effects"), usually we associate great editing with action or sci-fi films; films that are meant to be layered and deep. But here is a film that understands not just the basics of editing (I can't remember the last time a comedy used smash cuts so brilliantly), but how to frame a scene so that we understand where the characters are logistically in relation to one another (duh, that's what framing is for) and how their place in the frame can be used to tell a subtle joke. The film is paced well -- cut perfectly so that every joke feels natural and like the right type of punctuation, rather than feeling tired and superfluous -- and there are nuances that occur in the periphery that punctuate the jokes, too. There's a great scene near the beginning where Paul meets the entire family for the first time. At the dinner table Nic grills Paul (he even calls her "the griller of the family" before moving onto a different conversation) about his philosophies and life decisions. When Paul begins to spew his nonsense about doing "whatever works" for the individual, the shot is framed so that we can clearly see Joni, who is heading off the college and clearly sees Paul as an out for doing something she is scared of, and we see Jules and Nic, the former simply smiling (she is also a free spirit) and the latter subtly pouring another glass of wine. What's great about this moment is that prior to them all sitting down at the table together, Jules and Nic have a minor verbal quarrel over Nic's tendency to drink too much at social gatherings and Jules' tendency to micromanage. It's a great bit of foreshadowing that comically justifies Nic's rather serious tendency (which is a motif throughout that always pops up during moments where she seems to be alienating Jules). It's so refreshing to not just see a comedy that understands these basic film techniques, but to see any film have a grasp of filmmaking 101.
So what are His plans for me? I have no flipping clue. But I do know that I need to be better about trusting in Him and His guidance. I'm not entirely sure what that entails, but it can only be good.
I plan my girls birthday parties almost a year before they happen.
I read the other day 'Harsh words said can always be forgiven, but they will never be forgotten'. I'm really glad I read that before our little situation happened that we had to deal with.
1pm Saturday and I was in the throes of my “change the sheets and sort through all the bits and pieces” phase. These were the bits and pieces I haven’t found a place for and have been getting shuffled around for months. Take note of the birthday card from my parents – the Barack and Michelle Obama one. My parents found this when they were in Chicago last year and thought it would be a hilarious card for me. When I opened it on my birthday morning my immediate thought was “what the fuck”. When I looked up at my chuckling Mother I said “but I don’t like Obama!” and her response was “we know!!! Isn’t it hilarious?!”.
But with clothes it is quite different. There are times I still want to wear what I want; but the question of what you can wear becomes more charged and complex as you age. And who is making that decision anyway? The fear of dressing inappropriately and landing on the pages of the worst-dressed list lurks like some ghastly specter around your closet. You ask yourself: Do I really need another accessory? Can I still wear shorts? Can I still wear red jeans? Can I still pull it off? Is it ... too much?
the news and the announcement of school closures. After that, no one
Instructional technologist and blogger Andrew Marcinek in this post describes how a one-to-one iPad tablet computer program at Burlington High School in Massachusetts is translating into engaging lessons for students. In one example, students in a French class are using the application VidEditor to create video reenactments of a favorite scene or chapter from a novel. Meanwhile, as part of a history lesson, students take on the roles of renowned philosophers as they bring the ideas of the enlightenment to life using blogging and Twitter. Edutopia.org/Andrew Marcinek’s blog (4/24)
The little-kid entries come to a stop all of a sudden, and don’t pick up again until I started writing again in my teens. And, oh boy, here comes the emo. But, yeah, the gap. Kicked in right about the point when she died. “Died”? Should I put that in quotation marks now? Anyway. Disappeared. Any desire to look at those notebooks went with her, for a long time.
So, how did I celebrate making it to this point where the countdown is on the last day of being a 3-digit number and tonight will roll over to being just a 2 digit number? I went and had my glucose test done! What a way to celebrate huh?
Luck was on my side because mine was one of the last flights out of O'Hare before hundreds were cancelled.
And finally.....
I like to 'mark' Easter, like we do Christmas (although on a slightly smaller scale), so I have a handful of holiday projects, for Little People who are, afterall, only ever at home with me, for every-other 25th December. They're old enough this year to get quite involved with the preparations. And I've been really busy, so we won't get around to them all this year, but we certainly enjoyed this one.
You know how you know you’re a bad blogger? You miss your own blogversary. Yeah that’s right, I missed it. Not intentionally. I set up a reminder for myself on my phone and I even tweeted myself a little “Happy Blogversary” but I didn’t come to the one place I was actually neglecting, my blog.
Like very many other challenges all our team members get so busy, especially me with the running of the challenge.
Only self-entitled wimps would consider suing the restaurant over this. Now had the dentist mutilated your mouth repairing your tooth I may have seen a lawsuit as a viable option. Since you're suing the restaurant and not the dentist I'm assuming he did a bang up job of putting that fake smile all politicians possess back on your face.
We would like to extend our revolutionary gratitude to the Liaison Committee comprising the HWRS of USA and CWG of New Zealand for their comradely support during this difficult time and we look forward to developing our relationship into one that ensures the revolutionary coordination of struggles in the different regions we come from. This is only the start for our role as the vanguard of the working class to whom we lay all our efforts and gifts as we embark on this historic mission. This to all intents and purposes is the launch of the first Trotskyist organization in this country and probably in the region and we are prepared to share our experience and struggles with our brothers in the region as we prepare for a revolution in Southern Africa as part of the African and world revolution. Despite the institutional challenges that we face we posses the most critical elements for any revolutionary body worth its name that is ideological and political clarity as well as a committed membership.
Others curiously
And then, what is also prominent is my little drawers, have to have everything sorted and on it's own, just my way i suppose............:))
The label of “prophet” is plainly a very honorable comparison. Indeed, invoking Elijah identified Jesus as the forerunner of the Messiah, who was expected from prophecy to reappear before the Messiah and the Day of the Lord (Mal 4:5). (France, NET)
I did a post a couple of days ago that was prompted by a question someone had asked on BlogCatalog and which I just randomly happened to see on there. The question was “What comes to mind when you think of Sweden?”
There are two kinds of “C’ & “D” players. One has potential for growth and the other doesn’t. Many think that all salespeople have potential for growth, yet, that just isn’t the case. Those salespeople who lack either Desire and/or Commitment for sales have very little incentive for change.
* Save $5 on performances for Sat., Oct. 24 at 2 pm or 5 pm and Sat., Oct. 25 at 11 am or 2 pm. (Excludes Front Row and VIP seats) Just enter code MOM on the MC Promotion line at http://www.ticketmaster.com/.
* Submit same photo and product recipes directly to CC&M and grant CC&M permission to use them in CC&M’s blog, Web site, gallery, etc.
I have always loved the poems of John Betjeman. Even as a child, the Englishness of his work and the underlying humour in many of his poems captivated me. I remember seeing Sir John at Oxford Circus back in the late sixties or early seventies. I was wandering aimlessly round the west end shops (as was my wont), when I happened to notice the great man, wearing his trademark trilby and a rather shabby raincoat, making his way through the crowds with an other-worldy expression on his face. I like to think that I was the only one who noticed him.
A better memory.
Yet will I see through my severest losses
On a plumber's truck.
Hello and welcome back to the Paper Shelter Challenges. We have been away for two weeks now and spent that time looking for new team members to join us. WOW! We never in a million years thought that we would get so many applying for a spot on our teams. Thank you to each and every one of you. We will have a hard time chosing between all lovely crafters out there. You all rock! So keep an eye out to find out who our new teamies are. When you least expect them to show up, they will be here! :)
One can only wonder.
The advantages and the “Martini learning” approach of delivering e-books to the medical students through mobile devices at University of Leeds were covered by Nancy Davies and sharing her experience.
Today I have a birthday card to share:
3) Add cut bacon and diced cheese.
1/4 cup toasted sesame seeds, optional
They strolled off and grazed quietly. At 3 PM I turned Gussie and Chickory in with them, and Belle and Nitro totally ignored them, while Rio came hollering up to greet them like long lost friends. Those three hung out together the rest of the day. No drama! Until it was time to bring them in.... then Chickory and Belle decided it was time to do laps.... poor little Nitro got a good workout keeping up to mama before the silly mares settled down and decided it was okay to get haltered and come in.
(3 gifts carved)
Surrender to the throbbing silence
Talking about hand sewing, I think I'm crazy because I just started to make 1" hexagons. I have no idea what I'm going to do with them... If I have enough courage, I might make a quilt. If not, a pillow or two probably.
... this one is another of my drawings with the head of Glinda, the good witch from the wizard of oz (again, Octopode) To finish the whole thing off I added touches of stickles glitter glue.Pleased with it but disappointed it's soooo late :(
Best Director Charles Chaplin, Modern Times
A member of Victoria's Equal Opportunity and Human Rights Commission board has resigned after stirring controversy by signing a petition opposing gay marriage.
PAPER: Misletoe Level 2 paper pack
- Students practice fluency by reading a story while a partner illustrates the mind movie that is created (thus practicing listening comprehension / visualization skills)
As for trolls in literature, let's name a few more from the European fairy tale tradition. In Perrault's "Little Tom Thumb," Tom tricks an ogre into cutting off his seven daughters' heads instead of the heads of Tom and his six brothers, who have been Hansel-and-Greteled. Puss in Boots famously kills an ogre, also by tricking him. And Jack climbs up the beanstalk, where he tricks and robs another man-eating, ogreish giant. In the Scandinavian tale "East of the Sun, West of the Moon," a girl must rescue her lost love by tricking a troll princess (see Mercer Mayer illustration, right). And don't forget the classic D'Aulaires Book of Trolls, which combines stories about trolls with troll miscellany and marvelous illustrations.
ARTWORK is also very welcome - whether to accompany your story/poem or inspired by one of Katherine's books! Please send this as a .jpeg or .gif picture file attached to your email (keep the original for yourself).
David Wagoner
Passing sweet hours, immortal and mystic hours with you dearest
The N&O reports on differences in public reaction between rape charges stemming from the lacrosse party and those from the more recent alleged attack at an off-campus party:
Surely, in that same moment somewhere else, the sun will set
The time to stop a war is before it starts. To secure Europe, we must throw off the Zionist vermin which treat us as unthinking cattle. We must demand a halt to all immigration and a return to their homelands of all non-Europeans. For the safety of the indigenous population, and the colonists, the colonies must be removed. The cost of war is far higher economically than would be the cost of relocating the colonists to their homelands, and providing them with financial support which would benefit their homelands as well as themselves. The human cost of any war which serves Zion and the International Order is unacceptable. It is of paramount importance that the Axis of Evil is stopped, and the control of Europe worldwide is returned to Europeans.
What would yours say?
Sorry. Circus Week was interrupted by a trip out of town to our State's High School Volleyball Tournament last week with my DD and her team. They came in 3rd! Not what they hoped for, but still a great showing!! Then I have been trying to catch up on being gone for most of the week last week! Now club VB tryouts have begun and DS has finished football and Basketball has begun!
Intriguing stuff, eh? Especially as many of today's brands are in there: Stella, Fosters, Heineken, Tennents, Skol (then still called Graham's) and Amstel.
He respects my choices and does not cause trouble but his comments do get to me on occasion.
The chat:
Every Thursday
Parents and teachers said the facilities are maxed out already, especially after the federally-financed turn-around of Global Studies. Over the course of one year Global Studies has gone from an F on its school report card to a B, and hopes to expand. "But we will not be allowed to grow with another school in the building,” said teacher Clare Daley.
- Carry rice for them.
Chicago radical anti-business environmentalist. Blames George Bush for "Poisoning the water that minorities have to drink." No experience or training in water management whatsoever. Former ACORN Board member (what does that tell us?)
A good friend acted as our florist and decorator. Andrea wanted a fall theme for the wedding. She painted all the pumpkins, and our friend let us use the gazebo. We picked up packages of leaves at the dollar store, but we ended up having to move them out from under the wedding attendants as they kept getting caught up by Andrea's dress. Her dress acted like a rake.
Indiana School Library Devastated by Tornado Still Needs Help by Lauren Barack from School Library Journal. Peek: "After the baseball-sized hail subsided, Riggs and her students-none of whom were injured-picked their way out of the rubble to find their library destroyed and all of the books gone."
Happy Easter Everyone!! He is RISEN!!
The execution left a lot of room for improvement:
My theme, though, is no matter what the provocation or how terrible the situation, that goodness prevails. I would like to believe that is true. I've always liked the existentialists who said if there is no God, then Man would have to invent a god to bring order out of chaos. For perhaps without a god of some sort to measure out rewards or punishment for acts here on earth, there would be no reason to be good. At least this theory explains evil.
I know how hard it can be to come up with gifts for husbands, brothers, dads, etc so I thought I would share our month of gifts here with you all. I will do a post once a week (or thereabouts) relating what I made and how (and maybe some notes about what he thought). Here we go:
5 sleeps!!!
Ugh. I'm putting off grade cards (again). Anyway, I'll keep this quick. This is probably silly, because I'm sure you all know about this, but on the off chance you don't, it can make school work muuuuch more bearable.
The patent process is a lengthy and expensive one. For a small inventor, it is frequently necessary to raise funds to even enter the process. In this atmosphere, where the inventor has no protection prior to filing at all, how do you go about doing that? You can’t reveal your invention because whoever you show it to can simply cut you out, rip off your idea and file on their own, soon to be all perfectly legal.
To the Western world it may be difficult to discern any kind of progress from one age to the next with all the violence within India and strife between Hindus and Muslims, between India and Pakistan. For that matter we see a lot of horrific acts committed Hindu against Hindu. But that’s no different from any society. It’s human nature. Those of other faiths may criticize present day Hindus saying, “If you don’t know your Vedas, how can you say you are living by them with a respect?” But is it really any different from the People of the Book who feel a passionate connection to certain verses in the New Testament but tend to dismiss the Old Testament? It’s all the same collection of scriptures they claim to have faith in and while they may go through their days with kindness in their hearts, donations to those in need, and keeping their tempers in check, are they also thinking all the time about the story of Noah and the ark? Jonah and the whale? The episodes with Moses and the burning bush and the baby in the basket?
Now, I know this is a lot for the tender ears of Americans to take, who like to think that their government reflects their own values of faith, freedom, and friendliness. But here is the point that libertarians have been trying to hammer home for many years: the US government is the enemy of the American people and their values. It is not peaceful, it is not friendly, it is not motivated by the Christian faith but rather power and imperial lust.
The reason for the permit policy is for both the Capitol and security staffs to work in concert with one another and ensure the safety of everyone in the building. As we have seen in the past, failure to require groups or organizations to submit a permit for use of the building, contributed to the state spending an additional $7 million for increased security and repairs to the Capitol.
Kale is one serious vegetable. This veggie packs a punch and is loaded with beta carotene, vitamin K and lutien as well as some good phyto-chemicals that are said to have potent anti-cancer properties! If you’ve never tried it, give it a go, your body with thank you for it.
White (used Patons Astra White)
Keep the lines of communication open, continue to check your work for feedback, and watch this site. While we look at rhetorical analysis in class, the wake of the third quarter will be our focus at home.
The other day Kipling organized a very fun event for bloggers in which they showed us their new collaboration with Jean Charles de Castelbajac. Lots of fun prints and details, you'll love it! (Available at Kipling stores this season and online). In the event we were photographed by Marc Palencia, after we had been stylized by Ana Gayo (helped by Lili Jiménez) and Tere Alamillo para The Beauty Class (helped by Cristina Hurtado).
(4) Newsletter subscriptions of choice: I subscribe to fellow bloggers’ blogs and at least three of WP’s informational blogs. (The latter keep me updated on many things WordPress! J) I also subscribe to The Daily Post, “an experiment in blogging motivation from the folks atWordPress.com.” These lovely folks post blogging ideas and tips to help bloggers get the most out of their blogs. There are also daily and weekly post challenges, photo challenges—you name it. Each is delivered straight to my inbox.
WordPress offers themes and plug-ins that will do just that.
fine-grain sea salt
I’ve always been a nerd so I really can’t imagine what my life would be like without sci-fi, fantasy, etc. I get so unbelievably happy when I discover a new book or tv show, I literally light up like a firecracker. I am passionate about my nerdy pursuits so I feel like it makes my life better on a daily basis. Being a girl in the nerd world hasn’t really affected me other than the curious looks I get when I walk into a convention…although…that is much less the case today. It used to be that I was one of only a few girls in the whole place, now conventions are overrun with hot, nerdy ladies which is fantastic.
Let me be weak
My engine is not perfect. So, sometimes when the engine thinks there is a freebie... well the freebie might not be there... Please, do not blame the designer for that.
About 10 days after we arrived to post, we celebrated another certain someone's 1st birthday. It was a different sort of first birthday party, as we had just arrived to post and didn't really know a lot of people yet, so we just spent the day together as a family. We don't give our kids refined sugar until they are at least two, so there are no cutesie cake-face-smash photos, but Madison didn't mind. Her highlight of the day was that she got to have strawberries for the first time that day!
4. Art Rosenbaum - Sallu Goodwin
Jacking In
The entire Dallas/Fort Worth area only got 50 cases of this stuff, so good luck finding it somewhere near you. If you have money to burn, it's a wonderful way to do it. Since most of us don't, it'll just be the expensive beer the bourgeoisie drink while they figure out what to do with all that oil money.
We have hosted two universities –
of faith, the Bible says that “we
“Ugghhh….”
In the evening, when Josh get home from work, we load Landon & Corinne into the stroller and take a nice long walk. We started this when Corinne was about 5 days old, and I truly believe that though some days I have to make myself do it (the fresh air is nice, but my incision is most tender/sore in the evening) that the walking is really helping with my recovery. Something else I am hoping it will help with? Losing this baby weight! Since I am nursing I tend to eat like a horse to keep my energy up, but unlike the 30 pounds I had to lose after Landon, I only have 12 lbs to lose this time to get back to pre-baby weight! Yeah! It's pretty much all in my belly and in my face :-/ I'm not too worried about it now, I am going to give myself 9 months to get there, but sooner rather that later would be nice :) So hopefully the walking will help!
But this is not to say that Coronation Street doesn’t have its own problems. First of all, it’s downright appalling that a working class show in 1979 would have an all white cast. Coronation Street doesn’t get its first black major character until 1983, two years after Toxteth. While some defense can be mounted on the grounds that Coronation Street is set in a fictional Salford, which is not a very racially diverse part of Greater Manchester, the fact of the matter is that a depiction of working class Britain consisting entirely of white people is... troubling. And yes, the same criticism can be made of Doctor Who in this time period, but for Doctor Who that’s just a reiteration of the complaint that it’s entirely middle and upper class. For Coronation Street, it’s something else.
“Just go and get her number… we will order something for you… “Now I took menu card from his hands.
AEI Acquires Beijing Macrolink Gas 20
15 years have passed since this photo was taken in Singapore, but the memories of my fantastic well qualified secretary Susie Valsalan pop up when I find that she has birthday today.
Wow alot has happen since I wrote last. I am planning surgery for my complete srs and breasts which is needed hehe, too small on top. I will keep you all in touch as my hair is now growing back.
We’re still glowing from World Book Night over here and the thousands of free books given out all over Austin (not to mention the nation), so this story really impressed us. Sarah Dewitz, a young person living in Orlando, Florida, looked around her community and saw there were people who needed things, things like books. So this incredible girl set out to organize a massive collection in her community and has now donated over 75,000 books through her Just 1 Book program. Now Sarah’s hitting the road in a book mobile. Watch the video on her website and just try not to feel inspired.
A bath that is heavenly, especially when filled with bubbles, and a shower that is all business.
Every moment felt like an adventure.
The far left the fanatic democrats,will vote for Mr.Obama ,because birds nest with their own kind .Can the liberal democrats ,tell me one thing that makes Mr.Obama,so intelligent , so brilliant and impressive ?during the last three and a half year ,since Mr. Obama been in the white house ,made many mistakes,yet he wants the American to re-elect him.His socialism agenda ,his health care plan will hurt every American.WE CAN’T TAKE FOUR MORE YEARS OF OBAMA.He stopped the offshore oil drilling, thousands of American lost their jobs.Companies are moving to other countries because of the stiff regulations the Obama’s staff imposing on these companies. The farmers are suffering because of the same regulations.How do you feel when you see Mr. Obama the president of the Great USA bowed to the king of Saudi Arabia?How do you feel ,when he gives the queen of England an i pot?How do you feel when he can not differentiates between cinco de Mayo and cinco de cuatro.These are only few of his embarrassments .Do you still want to re-elect him?
Those with weak hearts, pregnant women and those with epilepsy are advised not to go to this exhibition - there is a lot of use of strobe lighting, which wasn't advertised clearly beforehand, so if you're sensitive to it, give this one a miss. Also, if you're claustrophobic, you will also probably want to give this one a miss - there's one "room" that made me struggle a bit, and I *like* small dark spaces.
- OPI - ABSOLUTELY ALICE
Unfortunately today is miserable but I decided to bring inside some beautiful yellow daisies for a bit of that sunshine feeling. Goes well with my favourite Van Gogh print.
But hold!
So, firstly, the bleak bit:
Possible line-up:
3 train
The first time I prepared a ground turkey dish was tossing the rounded balls of fresh ground turkey and cooking them in a spicy, sweet and sour sauce in a large pot on the stove top. These were a big hit with guests and of course the turkey balls with sauce partnered well with rice or couscous for a complete plateful.
Scott Greenfield responded: "what did they need support for? I suppose they could get hungry if they stood there long enough. Or perhaps a wrist could be sprained if they were to do something risky to wrists."
On top of that Slipshod and I are ogling houses for sale that are posted on the internet. It is really fun to look at all the pictures and sometimes we drive by them as well. Last Sunday Slipshod even took Sweet Pea out for part of the day and then went to FIVE open houses! Sweet Pea now demands that our new house must have a pool. ha ha! We'll see about that. It's a possibility but maybe not a probability.
and only found endless sorrow
Stick it in the oven, bake it for a little less than an hour until you can see it all brown and gorgeous and calling your name. Sugar calls my name with alarming frequency. I am subscribing to the theory that it’s because i’m so smart. See, your brain uses 70% of all your glucose, so I need extra glucose to keep my brain happy. It has nothing to do with addiction. Nothing.
So I’m just going to point out 10 differences between us Canadians and Americans. I’ll be nice.
Caramel Apple: 3
23. I Dont Want To Be The One
If, as projected by at least four different opinion polls, the YES side prevails as victorious at the August 4, 2010 Referendum on the Proposed Constitution, Kenyans will have carved an important milestone on the tortuous and meandering odyssey in the long quest for a new, just and democratic order in East Africa’s most vibrant economy.
“It was clear he just didn’t care about the animals,” Ringelberg said.
Use the ink cartridges made by the selfsame concern of the machine if you pauperism the unexceeded property of printing. It tends to be costly but if you reckon of the angelical it will channelise you then it gift be worth it.
A comparison: Saul and David
It is simply a matter of engrossing yourself in Mu so totally that there is no room for thoughts of any kind, including Mu itself.
We have a big birthday party planned here on Saturday night. I'll die if it storms.. what it with the weekend storms this year anyway? FYI.. It isn't supposed to be that way Mother Nature.
Coyote: yip
Lightly spoon the flour into dry measuring cups; level with a knife. Combine flour and water in the bowl of a stand mixer. Stir, using the dough hook, until a soft dough forms. Turn the dough out onto a lightly floured surface. Knead until smooth and elastic (about 3 minutes). Divide the dough into 16 equal portions. (I found the dough weighed exactly one pound, and weighed out 16 one-ounce balls). Roll each dough portion into a 6-inch circle on a lightly floured surface. Brush 8 pancakes evenly with oil. Top each with one of the remaining pancakes, gently pressing together.
Those with a vested interest in denying you your free personal choices in all manner of different behaviours have been queueing up to copy anti-smoking tactics for a long time. I'm sure you could post links to very many examples yourselves, it's not like they're rare.
Do I run harder early on and tick off some decent miles whilst feeling fresh; or
(April 16th, Syfy, 9PM)
You will need: cream cardstock, Brown ink, Scratch Pattern stamp, paper trimmer, transparent tape, ribbon, yarn
You'll note the embossed line frame around the text body...well, I did that myself because it was way too costly to have done at the printers. I had to measure all 60 from the back and make little pencil dots to ensure the frame would be perfect. A lot of work, but looks so nice.
Raisins
Picture book sequels, however, do not continue the action from the previous book. Instead, the author usually takes the protagonist from the previous story and simply places her in a new adventure. This seems appropriate for a younger child who would rather have her book represent an entire world.
We want to see you use bright colors or display a sun somewhere on your project.
There are those in life you meet, and they make you smile. Then there are those in life you cross paths with, and they leave footprints on your heart and warm your soul. Emma and Tristan, are the latter. I like to peg it to her sweet sugar-coated smile and spirit, and his gentle natured heart, both combined make one of the nicest people I've had the pleasure of getting to know and photograph. The real joy on the day though, was to watch just how much in love these two are...you could see it in the way he gazed upon her adoringly, you could see it in the infinite 'just-because' kisses that were exchanged, and you could see it in the sweet beloved way they embraced one another under the cool spring breeze that floated around the entire day.
My Boyfriend Scales Walls is a
This is not your ordinary quilt pattern book. Most of my quilt books have an introduction to quilting, instructions, and patterns. Cynthia added a little extra by creating a book that explains the very heart of quilting and its connection to home, friends and family. Her book begins with a little family history and what life was like back in the 1930s. As a genealogist, I was particularly interested, but you don’t have to study your own family tree to enjoy her stories.
Only let me know your holy and true will.
I am getting ready to go to college and I’m breaking up with my high school boyfriend in the process. Before I take the next step, I feel I need to cleanse my soul. Should I come clean to my boyfriend and admit that I was unfaithful to him, or just allow us to go our separate ways?
I do think that if the country as a whole sees Washington act responsibly, compromises being made, the deficit and debt being dealt with for 10, 15, 20 years, that that will help with businesses feeling more confident about aggressively investing in this country, foreign investors saying America has got its act together and are willing to invest. And so it can have a positive impact in overall growth and employment.
I wouldn’t mind having the Dagda for my father! He was a Celtic god who doesn’t really have an equivalent in the Greek or Norse pantheons. He was the god of hospitality, which is important to me, and he had a magic cauldron – my kind of guy. If I had been able to inherit a power from him I should like it to have been endless expansive hospitality.
I learned about Kiva a few years ago, when one of my sisters (who runs this Etsy shop) suggested that all our siblings donate money to the charity Kiva instead of giving each other Christmas gifts. What a way to celebrate what Christmas is truly about!
Have you tried looking in the mirror? Are you one of those people who, almost every day of their lives, deal with skin problems like acne, wrinkles and other skin related condition? You may not know it but the little things you do or don’t may slowly ruin your skin. Apart from this, water helps in distributing important nutrients all throughout the body. In order to avoid getting wrinkled and unhealthy skin, here are some ideas that could help you out.
Cardstock: White, Enchanted Evening, Spring Rain
10/13- Stillwater Artisanal Ales dinner at Jack's Bistro, $65- This is a pair made in heaven. I have not had the pleasure of being at one of Stillwater's beer dinners, but I have heard that they are great. I don't know where you can go wrong with the great Stillwater beers and Jack's creative menu- who knows what Ted will come up with.
Thanks for visiting. You are simply adored :)
another waiting just behind
Details: 105 pages - undated (This is an early draft of the script. The situations, characters, and plot may change significantly by the time the film is released. This is not a definitive statement about the project, but rather an analysis of this unique draft as it pertains to the craft of screenwriting).
Most Mondays I am just dragging and wishing it was Friday already. Not that I don't wish it was Friday but I got some good sleep last night thanks to Logan for sleeping 6 hours through, so I actually feel pretty good for a Monday. The weekend flew by as usual but I still managed to get a few things accomplished and will be showing you the finished products this week. Today I am showing a 1st birthday invitation for a good friends daughter. I can't believe Gracie is going to be ONE already! Time really does fly by with the little ones. This is going to be a fall themed birthday party that includes pumpkin decorating and a hay ride for the kids. How fun! Hope you like it.
I come to a realization that there are certain facets of my life that used to be so inherent to me, and are now missing. I come to this realization more than once, in fact, quite frequently, and make a pact with myself to change this. Of course the pact becomes lost and four weeks later, I find myself again in the company of that familiar realization.
Cara: I chose an obvious way, and went to graduate school for an MFA in Creative Writing (Columbia University, 1995).
“The Chevrolet Volt ushers in a new era of automotive technology and calls for a new level of connectivity and control,” said Walt Dorfstatter, president, OnStar. “Nearly 6 million vehicles on the road today use OnStar to stay connected, and our new smartphone app will make that even easier for Volt drivers.”
We got asked on a train once (while holding hands and kissing no less)... if we were brother and sister!
We’ve been back at school for two weeks now. They haven’t been full weeks by any means, so we’re still trying to get back in the flow of things. Here’s a little peek at our curriculum for this year.
Founded in July 2010 in Portland, OR the Brewing up Cocktails series of events explores the interplay of craft beer and spirits to create a new breed of beer cocktails. Since its introduction beer cocktails have exploded onto the national drink scene and BuC has been at the forefront. Founders Ezra Johnson-Greenough, Jacob Grier, and Yetta Vorobik have presented more than seven different cocktail events spanning three states and two countries in just one year. They have also been asked to present on beer cocktails at the Spring Beer & Wine Festival, Cocktail Camp, Tom Douglas Restaurants, and Portland Cocktail Week.
His favorite toys right now are a little tractor and a top that we brought home from Grandma Johnson's house a few years back.
Here's what Byrds bassist Chris Hillman had to say about Clark's lyrical gifts:
'The power of metaphor is located in constraint,' he is reported as saying, and 'now that anything can be said, fiction is in deep trouble ... I believe the narrative form is very tired.'
Calling yourself progressive is a good indication that, not only are you easily deceived, you’re clearly too self absorbed in your own desire to appear “progressive” to those around you to care that your “help” it’s not needed, wanted or appreciated by anyone other than those that convinced you that it is. Wake up! They’re wrong, and so are you. If you believe you’re acting in someone else’s best interest, “for their own good”, you are clearly infected. You are being manipulated into soliciting the government to rescind not only my liberty, but your family’s, your neighbors’, your friends’, and ultimately your own as well. The real tragedy here is that once you are infected, it is nearly impossible to cure without a similar societal trend in the other direction. A reality check to the devastation caused by the substantial loss of liberty to the entire population. Only then, when you realize you have also become a victim of someone else’s unrequested “help” will you begin to understand the damage you have caused.
dining-room set.
The lower rated books were both books I received as advance reading copies to review. Break the Skin by Lee Martin is newly released last month, an okay thriller that probably won’t stick with me very long. Eyes Wide Open by Andrew Gross, on the other hand, was so excruciating to read that I ended up skimming the last few chapters. I think I’ve had my fill of thrillers for a while.
Alas, careful observation might point to a Jewish pathology stranger even than the MacDonald biological reductionist theory, if without the malignancy MacDonald attributes. Actually, it could be labeled as “much too much of a good thing” or, in the Oriental view of things, “yin toxicity,” or maybe “slow-motion hara kiri.”
Mary: What do you do to "unblock" writer's block?
I had a temporary mind lapse today in that I forgot about mine.
Allowing Apimed's appeal, the Court of Appeal (for whom Lord Justice Kitchin delivered the judgment) took the view that Judge Fysh had accepted expert evidence that an obvious way to address the application and retention of honey was to make it thicker by use of a thickening agent, and that alginate was an obvious candidate because of being commonly used in the wound environment. However, he had not considered that the only way alginate was used in the wound environment was in the form of calcium or sodium-calcium alginate pads, which did not act as a gelling agent as called for by the claim. The Court of Appeal drew attention to the words of Mr Justice Kitchin (as he then was) in Abbott Laboratories Ltd v Evysio Medical Devices UCL [2008] EWHC 800 (Pat), [2008] RPC 23, where he said (at para 180):
Patches, the perfect dog.
I thought they were delicious, but they're a sophisticated kind of cookie, not the kind your kids are going to beg for. They're full of pecan flavor as there are ground pecans in the cookie as well as one crowning jewel right on top. I used local Texas-sized pecans from my in-laws' backyard so to me, they're extra special. They're not too sweet but they have an added crunch from the sprinkling of raw sugar on them before baking. Butter was the key in making them crisp and retaining their shape. The maple flavor was subtle, as I didn't use the maple extract, but they flavor intensified the next day. These are a perfect gift-giving cookie or for keeping at home and dunking in a mug of hot tea or coffee.
Why do the collective ‘we’ look to people, mostly famous or notorious, for wisdom?
The skirt of the dress falls, partly through the thin fabric, like a waterfall gently downwards.
Here are some tips for you when trying to track down an FFS surgeon to complete your surgery:
Life is just one big visual candy store as far as inspiration goes! Fashion, nature, travel...it all goes into the hopper. Lately I’ve been using some of the roses in my garden as an inspiration for monochromatic palettes. (There are literally 7 different shades of pink in this one bloom – so you get a space that’s restful, and yet totally lush and interesting.)
Family Law
2. Weekend Herb Blogging entries should have the goal of helping people learn about cooking with herbs or plant ingredients.
“Same old things, Little Man. Same old things.”
Instead of having me sing or do any other bard-y type stuff to see if I’m worthy of becoming a bard, Viarmo starts telling me about this festival, The Burning of King Olaf. Apparently, the queen is forbidding the bards to throw it on account of an effigy of this Olaf guy getting burned during it. Viarmo explains that the queen’s husband the King was just murdered, and she does not see the festival as being in good taste. Long story short, Viarmo wants me to track down a poem that this King Zoloft, or whatever, has written that will justify the festival to the queen. Oh, and it’s located in some ruins called “Dead Men’s Respite…”
While she attended an all-girls Catholic high school, Cisarik only experienced religion during times of tradition, such as Christmas and Easter.
If you're into trying the Type Connection experience for yourself, you can visit their site here. Or, if you're the up, up, down, down, left, right, left, right, select, start type, you can skip the game and go here to download the "specimen_xxx.jpg" files that appear to have some value for future design projects. I suggest you snag copies of these images soon before they turn off directory browsing. Here is an example of these images:
And squealed like a pig when I whittled one ball.
It still is. If there is a god I have no doubt that s/he loves all of us.
Miss Baltimore
Another version of the same gene, which was prevalent in Asian populations, they said was associated with collectivism and a greater willingness to put the common good first.
I was a child in the sixties
It's an odd coincidence that one of other songs that I think rivals the absolute perfection of "Eight Miles High" has the word "miles" in its title. I'm speaking of the The Who's "I Can See For Miles," of course.
are measuring the drips of sweat
RCMP Sgt. Line Karpish said the investigation began in November 2008, targeting organized crime and street-crime activities that threatened public safety.
“I’m not sure that technique and improvisational abilities improve with age,” the pianist said. “I think what improves is your sense of judgment, of maturity. I think you become a much better editor of your own material.”
Dundalk v UCD – Friday 7.45
Camping kit
Daddy: ”A talking Mars Bar, I’ll try but I can’t guarantee it”
that seeks with blind hunger, addiction, and mindless rage
The book was full of tags, pockets and flaps and embellished with brads, ribbons, buttons and bows.
With that said, MFT has to be the best company out there to "work" for, and I am so grateful for the last 6 months! It has been a blast creating with their stamps! Hopefully when (if!) things ever slow down, Kim will consider letting me come back! ;) I'm still on the team through the end of January, so I'm not done with them yet! ;)
When GPG came across my facebook feed this morning with their newest rescue, the sweet face of Trendley tugged at my heart's strings. I immediately hugged Oz and started to sob. The gauges in her neck from the chain that was tying her up, skin infections and obvious malnourishment ate away at me all day. I could not get her blue eyes and sweet, sad look out of my head. It is beyond me how someone could hurt an innocent, loving animal. What kind of evil person could do that?
Telling secrets in my eyes
What is the GOP fight all about? It’s a fight against women, the middle class, young people who aspire to enter the middle class or stay in it. It’s a political fight against President Obama and the Affordable Care Act, which Republicans are hell bent on destroying. And it’s a fight to preserve the corporate ruling class that has bought the party, which was a gift from the conservative activist judges on the SCOTUS via their anti-democratic Citizens United ruling.
I do not want to win this issue of eliminating the office by moves designed to predetermine the outcome. I have a strong belief in an open and transparent policy debate, and in letting the people of Wisconsin speak on Election Day. I do not want to win this fight by tying the hands of those who might be opposed to closing the office. My pledge to serve only one term should assure you that I believe that we will win on this point, without any action that would make the passage of this bill, for all intents and purposes, inevitable.
Dice this and brown it with 4 diced onions and 6 crushed garlic cloves (we have a large family). Divide that into three gallon sized freezer bags. You don't even have to brown the sausage and cook the onions, we just prefer the flavor. But I'm not sure it makes a big enough difference to be a deal-breaker if you don't have time to brown the sausage, onions, and garlic.
The Regime is working hard to make life easier for Americans. All they ask for is a little bit of unconditional compliance, but these pesky dissident Patriots keep throwing a wrench in the plans. It is vital that you do not cause difficulty for the Regime – they are only trying to do what’s best for you. Resistance is just plain rude.
I have a problem with televised debates. And at news shows where talking heads yell at each other. And talk shows where people yell at each other.
That I know.
Speakers: William Yong (Zata Omm Dance Projects), Julian Sleath (Program Manager, Special Events City of Toronto), Sue Edworthy (Arts Consultant)
As my loyal readers may know, I rejoined the bizarro-world better known as Facebook after a year away. I went back for one reason only – to drum up some readers for my dopey blog posts. At the time, it seemed a small price to pay for my own perception of popularity.
-Naturally, the Guardsmen aren't keen on the idea of a 10 year old sneaking onto their base, at least until a Talon attacks.
This post is one of a series from Botany professor Nisse Goldberg's students at Jacksonville University. Student authors: Kristine Brown, Kristina Robbins, and Marc Rothe
If you're looking for a nice distraction to ease you back into work mode, check out these kitschy little baubles, each with it's own sense of charm. Perfect for a little "thank you" gift, or a meaningful (yet inexpensive) "thinking of you" gift. I love the dove hair pins, they'd look so pretty against dark hair! All at Eclectic Eccentricity.
The next day, the fabricated news was quoted by two major news agencies in China, ifeng.com and xinmin.cn, and was referred to as the official response from China’s State Administration of Radio, Film and Television (SARFT) for censoring Titanic. Although the two websites soon found out the news was fake and dropped their articles, it had already been read by too many people and started to go viral online.
Hardcover, 347 pages
you scream your dreams aloud with every twist, every speech, every off-color jest
Four new survey questions have been added to my sidebar. Head on over to to vote. The responses I have received so far on all the previous questions have been really interesting and even a bit surprising.
In 2008 I've joined several forums, took classes and started to take it more seriously.
The second plot deals with Puck trying to figure out his plan. This plot was also something of a mess mostly because of sloppy writing. Large blanket statements are continually made about graduation when the SHOW clearly stated that not everyone was the same class status. Puck at one point says that the Glee guys have been like his fathers for the past four years… who let this line go to air?! Yeah it’s kinda sentimental but its totally full of shit. If that line were directed at Mike and Finn it MIGHT be accurate, but in any other context it is totally wrong! First off, Puck didn’t join Glee until his sophomore year so he didn’t meet Artie until then. Furthermore Sam didn’t come until they were juniors and Sam’s joining Glee ran concurrent with Puck’s stint in juvie. Blaine and Rory didn’t come on the scene until Senior Year and Joe has only been around for two or three episodes… so really barely any of them have actually KNOWN him for the four years let alone acted as parental figures… that really annoyed me. Apart from that you see Puck determining to leave school, then having a change of heart after a run in with his dad and then realizing that despite his best efforts he may still not graduate… I tended to care more about this plot, because it dealt with a familiar and likable character, however it has some flaws that really held it back.
Let's Ride (Delete Track)
So, you know how at a certain moment--usually a little too early on in November--by seemingly subliminal accord, an army of janitors are sent to their respective basements to retrieve their dusty garlands and fairy lights, junior sales clerks in malls everywhere are tasked with arranging gaudy displays of tinsel and beglittered glass ornaments, and suddenly pepperkake and juleøl are back in your life? Well, maybe that last example only happens here in Norway, but that's just too bad for the rest of ya'll, isn't it?
In my town, which to my knowledge has never held a St. Patrick's Day parade, (too few Irish people), our annual ethnic celebration from a Northern European culture is now canceled and has been 'merged' with Cinco de Mayo. I wonder: when Mexicans come to dominate this town, as in places like Maywood, California or Mattawa, Washington, will they 'let' anybody have a Northern European cultural festival? Will they allow Whites to take center stage in their Latino cultural celebrations? I ask rhetorically, of course.
However, it's just a matter of keeping the same dreams and extending your goals. It's not as if you fall off the earth at that point. When I was 20, I thought life ended after you got married. What a shock it was after I got married to realize you keep waking up day after day. That's the same thing with the 40's. You have more days to do more!
Alright, here we are at the most troublesome part of the movie. First, narratively lazy. Chris just happens to be passed out on the couch when Knox sits down. Second, where is Chet Danbury? Off somewhere groping some other drunk girl? And isn’t this assault? You can’t kiss passed out girls, can you? I mean, if he copped a feel, that’s a felony. And why does Chris leap to Knox’s defense? Wouldn’t she more likely say “Yea, beat the shit out of this asshole, Chet!”
Mike says you can find anything to fit the things you left behind. All your favorite places can be filled with new favorites, but the people you leave, that's harder. "We miss the people," he says. "We'll always go back (to North Carolina) because of that." For now, he says it's more of a joy to discover new things in Kansas City. "It'll be a beautiful, new challenge."
18. Do you have a workout buddy?
“When we met him he came up to my husband and said, ‘Will you pay my telephone bill?’” Brand recalled. “And my husband said, ‘Yes.’ Well, my husband didn’t know he called Rome and all over the world. It was a $300 telephone bill. That was a lot in those days.”
‘But he’s not telling you that. He’s telling you literally nothing.’
Pre-OMA Audit
Portland
Last week was the Craft Den's fourth birthday so to celebrate Lynn held an open day and the lovely Kay from IndigoBlu was there all day demonstrating her fantastic stamps. In the evening those of the DT, past and present, who could make it were treated to a lovely buffet and a workshop courtesy of Lynn.
I'm always looking for new ways to use leftover roast chicken.
Did I read that right? Your washing machine is broken???? EEK... run away, run away... the laundry monster is going to gobble you up! How--in--the--world-- are-- you--surviving? I know... just make your kids wear their clothes inside out on every other day? oh yeah, right. They already do that. (joking....) When are you going to get a new one? Now, I'm really worried about you!
Did you backread everyone else's posts? I'm impressed at the journalistic background-checking here, impressed, I say!
(I do this with movies sometimes, going in with absolutely no information except for the title. One of the first times was with the Irish movie "The Snapper," an adaptation of Roddy Doyle's novel about an unexpected baby. The title was obscure but vaguely misleading; the movie was delightful. Thereafter I attempted to repeat it as often as possible. Not so easy with beer, but still I try.)
It’s considered good etiquette to offer a taste of your wine to your server. Of course, this works better for all concerned when you bring a better quality wine. You don’t want the person offered a taste to gag on the cheap wine you bought at “Larry’s House O’ Wine”.
The wheels on my skates are really slick. I thought it was all in my imagination until I talked to Ruthie. Slick wheels don’t grab onto the floor, making it harder to push off. I’ve decided this is why it’s so hard to get any sort of momentum.
4 eggs, separated (yolks and whites separately)
for the wisdom that you’ve shown.
1/2 tsp. onion powder
Suicide is the highest cause of death among those in their 20s and 30s in South Korea, which in 2007 had the highest suicide rate among members of the Organisation for Economic Cooperation and Development.
Looking after a mentally disabled child takes a lot of tax payer's money, and many of them are completely dependent on one or more people for their continued survival. If a mother cannot handle the burden of looking after someone who requires 24/7/365 attention for the rest of its life, then shouldn't she should be allowed to make a decision on its life? Not all mental handicaps can be detected before 24 weeks. It's a terrible double standard, it shouldn't make a difference whether or not the child is born or unborn.
Imagine our surprise when we get a reply, available over here, informing us that a recent decision of the Central Information Commission (CIC) had ruled that the RTI Act would be inapplicable in cases where there was an existing procedure to obtain information from the concerned authority. We were therefore informed that we were required to pay the fee under the G.I. Act & Rules to receive our photocopies. We have also been, independently, informed that the CPIOs at the IPO have every intention of using this particular order of the CIC to deny all RTI requests pertaining to information which are covered by pre-existing mechanisms.
One thing that is part of my perspective on our situation, is the constant battle for superiority / authority / supremacy / control / etc within our relationship. And we have now talked about it a little. Our councillor refers to it as stubbornness. I think that’s over simplifying things, but I take his point. There have been a couple of moments when he’s referenced our backgrounds, the environments we grew up in, our parents relationships, which all felt nauseatingly and predictably Freudian (he has Freud, Jung and “NLP for Dummies” on his book shelf) … tell me about your childhood … fuck off!!! … but I kind of see his point. But for me (and this probably says a lot about my need for supremacy) I almost felt that my Wife was acknowledging that I was right, and that some of the problems originated with her behaviour. Hurrah! Oh, hang on. This isn’t about me winning, is it. Ok. I get that. But in my defence (as I see it), so many of my over reactions are a very much reactions. And a reaction is inherently a response to an action. Take away my Wife’s negative actions, and my negative reactions disappear as well. QED. “Now, Freud, when you’ve shoved that up your arse, can we get back to my neuroses … Where were we?”
the police department). And if you wish to wander in foreign lands,
10So now, I have come here with the first of the fruits of the earth which you, O Lord, have given me. Then you will put it down before the Lord your God and give him worship:
Once you find another business to co-market with, however, make sure you work out a contract with them stating which type of marketing you will be doing together (postcards, fliers, special event) and that the both of you will share the costs of said marketing.
This is Baby Pan... at least I think so, lol, by the looks of it's budding horns. I just put my hands to the clay and this is what happened. It's yet to be fired, so hope it turns out.
I am that person for our family, for Jackson and the boys. I am the comforter, the person they turn to, that will help if needed and always tell them it will all work out, it will be OK. But for the longest time after my mother crossed over, I didn't have that person in my life. Jackson is just not the "touchy-feely" type, he can say the words but not convincingly, and I know he feels uncomfortable saying it, so I don't ask. But I have other people to turn to.
AVOID THE TEMPTATION to get rich quick. Everybody wants everything instantly—instant rice, instant pudding, instant success—served in pablum form. My father was from Germany, and he said, “Always take time to be an apprentice and learn the whole job.” I did this… and it worked!
p.s. there are too many people i want to give awards to so please don't get offended if i didn't give you one. in my eyes you all deserve an award!
Initially I thought this was an art class. Then I realized she meant "college" and I looked to see the name of the institution listed as XXX Community Collage. She is 29 and has been working in an office environment for 2 years and cannot spell college.
As I said in my last blog, the shopping experience wasn't at ALL what I was expecting. I put on my mental padding to brave the line backers and bag-toters but turns out I didn't need them at all! If you can get to Passy on a Saturday around 11, there will be not a soul in sight and you can roam freely through the stocks without having to hip-check anyone. Lovely.
selfishness/responsibility
Cakes and cookies and chocolates galore!
Here you go, and you get another picture of Steve thrown in too.
…until we went to Tiffanys. Due to the expectation of crap weather (which was unfounded – it was cold, but dry) we had kitted up with our waterproofs (trousers and coats and hats) and our hiking shoes – we didn’t fit in with the rest of their clientele – this was hilarious! for me, not sure what the store felt. Nabeela decided to start off by having a look at the engagement rings – is there something she’s not telling me??!!
The formula is rather simple.
many that follow are also affected
The Rangers need to continue to play this way for round 2 against the Capitals.
Family and friends sat stunned in the pews
I would like to enter this card in the following challenge:
Then she goes into greater depth with basic discipline strategies. She discusses common roots to behaviour problems (like hunger, tiredness and so on), and how to deal with those, thus solving the the myriad problems that arise from them. Next she talks about some common ways to react to and prevent behaviour problems, providing a sort of smorgasbord of potential solutions from which you can pick and choose the ones that fit right with you.
Sparkling white wine
My dependence on entertainment came to a forefront today.
The teen would spend his lunch hour with the teacher where they became closer.
Here are just some examples of songs for a rockin' recessional:
"The Case of the Mysterious Weapon"
With many of our internships taking place at small and medium enterprises throughout Manchester, there is also scope to make a real impact on the company and get fully involved in their organisation. Two of our current interns have worked at events in France and Spain, another has been given the opportunity to attend courses on Search Engine Optimisation and Google Analytics- two increasingly relevant skills in many organisations today.
That said, the last two weeks have felt like a rollercoaster ride to me. Several positive possibilities have arisen, not come through, followed by more possibilities. Nothing has actually worked out yet, but maybe. I have felt excited, appreciated, competent, frustrated, disappointed, and excited again.
R22 lips
those who trifle with its sacred contents.
So, really lite week. Hopefully we'll be back to normal next week.
I’m not joking. In one weekend we poured our souls into a document that was 12k words in 16 straight hours and more than doubled the next day. And that isn’t uncommon for the two of us. What was uncommon was that the entire cast of characters, and the world we were playing in, was completely original, not a spot of fanfiction in sight. We have one other story that is original, but it took a back seat to many of our more demanding projects. *shrugs* It actually got sucked into this one. Another uncommon occurrence.
an inkling -
I must repeat Psalm 2:4. “He that sitteth in the heavens shall laugh; the Lord shall have them in derision.” They tried to exalt themselves at thetowerofBabeland look what happened in Genesis 11:8, “So the Lord scattered them abroad from thence upon the face of all the earth.”
When your children are young, you are the main source of new information and experiences.
Move to a rental home in Salt Lake City to see if we really do want to move back permanently, or if we are just feeling nostalgic.
For unfairly, less money is what
The excitement over this job has lead into a holy fear of what I have to do and how much work its going to be. Steven constantly reminds me that its about the gospel - sharing it with the kids, with the donors and with myself! If I don't preach the gospel to myself every day, I end up with a skewed version of Christianity... that somehow my GOOD things are saving me or somehow I have attained all the good in my life on my own. When I preach the gospel to myself, I realize NO! If it weren't for the grace of God, I would be lost and dying and in desperate need of a Savior.
“Three are the origin of faith, to refrain from saying; ‘they are disbelievers,’ if they say there is no god save Allah, merely because of a sin or bad action. Secondly, that Jihad is continuous until the Day of Judgement, till the last one of my Ummah fights the ‘Dajjal’. Thirdly to believe in the Qadr.”
1. For Mother's Day I _________
I really wanted to go here after it was featured in travel time (a travel show on tv). I was really excited knowing that my friend considered to include nagcarlan church as one of the 7 churches we are going to visit that day.
The following was written by Jim Luparello III, fellow AAE who has the great honor of sitting next to me:
2 comparison
And are whites alone, one wonders, in forming tightly knit groupings which resist outsiders? These days, in fact, any manifestation of collective white identity would be viewed as racism or at the very least something distasteful, which, curiously, does not apply to non-whites, who are encouraged to celebrate “diversity”, “difference” and “otherness”.
The sleeveless version is included and is great for those Indian Summer days or nights out on the town. Both will have you looking stylish and perfectly put together!
The French have voted against austerity, as have the Greeks. The Brits too had a poke at austerity with the local elections.
I am putting it to good use!
When I was growing up, Easter was basically a special family day where we dressed up in new Sunday clothes and went to church to show them off. Oh, we went to church every Sunday (twice), but Easter was special because everyone was all dressed up. I never understood why that was the case, because nothing was ever said or done differently on Easter Sunday than any other Sunday of the year... we certainly didn't have a special sermon on the resurrection. You see, not only did our church not follow the liturgical calendar, we acted as if there wasn't one. Easter and Christmas were like every other Sunday. In fact, I had a professor in school who suggested that we preach on the resurrection at Christmas and the birth of Jesus at Easter, just so no one got the idea that we believed in observing special days. It didn't dawn on me until much later that this setup a reverse holy day where you could stress the resurrection on any Sunday EXCEPT Easter. And that's kinda silly, I think.
Iason also finds enjoyment in watching Riki masturbate in front of him. And…judging from the satisfied look on Riki’s face, he doesn’t mind doing it. On a side note, this particular scene had much more intensity in the original OVA.
“Does it bother you?” he asked.
It is funny to ponder how wow and life changes. Happy Killing.
I was actually very impressed with the packaging, I got out my scissors and screwdriver anticipating the typical battle with the box and plastic ties but Penbino was secured to the box using cardboard twisties which I haven’t seen before, no scissors required! Penbino requires 4 AA batteries not included and Bebe comes with her own batteries already installed.
“Your birthday was yesterday, wasn’t it?”
I recently went to see an applied kinesiologist. He told me that the Cod Liver oil wasn't what my body wanted or needed...so I'm now taking a DHA. My body apparently LOVES the Bio Kult probiotics. I was also put on a Riboflavin (vitamin b), which makes my urine fluorescent yellow and a molybdenum. I will say that I will finish out the bottles, but not buy more. I researched molybdenum online and it isn't something that people are usually short on. In very rare cases there is a deficiency. I've been super sleepy, and coincidentally, over usage of molybdenum causes sleepiness.
It was during the month of August, while the Spanish continued to threaten the English coast, the witches of Scotland determined to act. This was a time for all inhabitants of the British Islands to protect their homes and culture from the invaders. Ruthie’s ancestors were not able to wield sword and musket but they were able to command nature to do their bidding. The witches of northern Scotland convened a council calling all elders to Callanish, located on the Atlantic coast of the Isle of Lewis in the Outer Hebrides, where stands a prominent stone circle and many other stone monuments assembled by visitors throughout the eons.
On the day Colin Powell appeared before the UN in January 2003 to present the case for war against Iraq, the tapestry of Picasso’s Guernica hanging outside the Security Council chamber was draped with a baby blue shroud. The UN media liaison, Abdellatif Kabbaj, explained: “We had a problem with, you know, the horse”.
While other parts of the body can be hidden, camouflaged or exaggerated to look more feminine, it is not always possible to mimic feminine facial features without surgical intervention. For this reason transgender women seek facial feminization surgery as a way to transform the face. However, FFS techniques allow us to obtain significant skull and facial changes that are often also desired by genetic females with more prominent masculine features.
A party cannot avoid infringement, however, simply by contracting out steps of a patented process to another entity. In those cases, the party in control would be liable for direct infringement. It would be unfair indeed for the mastermind in such situations to escape liability. District courts in those cases have held a party liable for infringement. See Shields v. Halliburton Co., 493 F. Supp. 1376, 1389 (W.D. La. 1980).
No fishing line, no hooks...how do you catch a fish?
1/4 tsp. liquid smoke
Chris Moyles: Which ‘s’ is a kind of whale that can grow up to 80 tonnes?
Its bright impossibility
I don't very often talk about London - not because it's not a fabulous city, it really is - but because I am spending less and less time here and my real focus (read heart) is in France. If I were to talk about London, now is the time, because London in June is at its best. In the words of Britain's esteemed author Samuel Johnson, 'No, Sir, when a man is tired of London, he is tired of life; for there is in London all that life can afford.'
And finally, to end where I started with another piggy! Here's my knitted Jean Greenhowe piggy *all finished*! Hurrah! He's been a WIP for quite a while now. He was almost finished at Easter ut I couldn't quite decided how to finish him off but then at the weekend my hubby suggested giving him a smile which made all the different! (In the pattern he just has eyes and the snout). I also made him a crocheted scarf (I tried making a chain, or using ribbon, or knitting a scarf but none of them looked right!) and I added two pink buttons to his tummy.
Jen's Bedouin dresses are redolent of the 1960's, when the sleeves narrowed and the length was shortened to ankle length. There is no evidence that it was cut and re-hemmed, and the sleeves are fitted and certainly won't wrap around your head! The stitching is incredible. Have another look:
I’m not the only one
So I had 2 forms of masking, one with the girl and the other with the stencil.
But how I define myself isn’t the question. The question is: When did the realization “I am a writer” hit? And my response holds true. I never did have that realization.
Sometimes I look in the mirror and I don’t recognize the person that you’ve become, the person that’s deep inside. Now don’t you wish that he was there. You make me sick.
Pay What You Can
( Growing up in a house with an architect-father, these were the kind of ideas that were often discussed and impressed upon us. Pretty on the outside is not equal to good design. The Fibonacci series and all that good stuff often made for casual conversation , if you got my father started after a well poured 'libation' ).
The claims that the social cohesion of the town was affected buy this man actions are really a bit over the top. The fact remains that the man's claims only gained legitimacy after their pathetic attempts to use him for political gain.
As a new Comfort Furnace owner I have recently become interested in the technology behind the product. I wanted to know what makes these heaters safer, more efficient, and more cost-effective than other styles of heaters on the market.
After dinner we held our annual Peep diorama competition! This was the year my 13 year old nephew realized that "diorama" sounds a lot like "diarrhea." So needless to say, he had some fun with that. We all worked hard on our dioramas and they came out great, if I do say so myself! Spoiler alert: I did not win. Yet again. Even though my talented 7 year old niece assisted me in making my diorama! So as you can see, the system is flawed.
Earrings : Dots
The eyes opened.
three of these amazing companies. Each company offers a unique line of
It's strange, the different relationships I have with different people, and their varying impressions of me.
Arrange bread slices on a baking sheet. Top with Gruyere and broil, 2 minutes, until golden brown and toasted. Divide soup among four serving bowls. Top each with a slice of bread. Sprinkle with chives and serve immediately.
So those are some things about books that aren't mine.
We started out our Saturday with an amazing breakfast at and great conversation about about education, community and empowerment, programs for youth and our hopes for the future together at the Tekrema Center for Art and Culture.
The build-up, which started with Iron Man, almost 4 years ago, till the release of Captain America: The First Avenger, had already gone out of control, just like Dr. Octavious’ reactor in Spiderman 2. However, after seeing the end result it all seems worth and justified. Undoubtedly, it is one of the best movie adaptations of Marvel comics yet, even though I have a soft corner towards the first installment of Spiderman (2002) and Iron Man being another top quality work, I would still rate The Avengers at a higher plane.
Sara Megibow is a newer agent building her client list. Her bio can be found here. She is looking for (via agentquery.com): "Literary Fiction, Science Fiction, Chick Lit, Commercial Fiction, Fantasy, Women's Fiction, Romance, Historical Fiction, Young Adult, Multi-Cultural, Middle Grade."
Breathing-out feel the breath as it leaves you.
The chicken cacciatore: “One of these things just doesn’t belong…” Visually, it wrecked the whole package. They brine it, and that’s okay, but the end result was an anemic looking piece of meat accompanied by a cacciatore sauce that begged for somebody's Nonna to come to the rescue.
Other highlights from the list include New York Liberty guard Essence Carson moving from No. 6 to the No. 3 spot and Tulsa Shock guard Marion Jones debuting on the list at No. 6. For overall team merchandise, new teams emerged in the top 5, including Minnesota (No. 1), the Atlanta Dream (No. 3) and the Indiana Fever (No. 5).
Encountered in deep caverns, these appear to be groups of naked humans lying prone. Closer inspection reveals these things have their limbs fused to their bodies. They tend to lie in loose circles around mounds of debris and items-- backpacks, rope, bones. Entering the circle will cause them to begin circling silently, slither up walls and across ceilings. Unfortunates caught within this circle will begin to feel the pull of the earth stronger and stronger. Many never leave (each round items go up in encumbrance - double weight or slots required. Characters will become unable to move in a number of rounds equal to their strength score).
she was given medicine.
Another thing about Zombie Vs. Ninja is the script. Written as it is by Ho, along with a mysterious contribution of story by AAV Creative Unit, We really do NOT get a major contribution to the story by the aforementioned Zombies. They don't attack in bloody force like they did in Zombie Holocaust or even Zombie 4: After Death for that matter. We get some standard stiff-moving, zombie characters who move around more like robots dancing around than they do zombies... or even kung-fu-trained zombies as far as that goes. One fight where it's three zombies against that buck-toothed old Undertaker trainer looks more like we should be listening to Grandmaster Flash and the Furious Five as everybody flails about. And I have a word about the gore in this zombie effort: and that word is NONE. There is no blood (except for one scene where the Undertaker gets a bloody nose), no guts, no brains and no other internal organs sloshing about. The only function of the zombies in this flick is to be sparring partners for this Ethan kid. Is this what we expect in a zombie movie?
They lived a long, loving life together.
Note that Plan B does not mean sticking Chamakh up front for the last 5 minutes. I’m talking about tactics here. We never seem to have a solution to teams that pack the midfield and slow our game down. Yet United, Barca, Bayern etc all face this scenario every weekend.
Oh really, Mr. Annan, the will of the international community. What about the will of the Syria people? How dare you shove your arrogant world vision down our throats! Will you stop before we’re all choking on it? You people make me sick!
The AG's opinion seems to suggest a (questionable) watertight subdivision between IP rights and data protection. It seems that the AG excludes any (natural) reciprocal interference unless expressly provided. Further, the AG's opinion apparently underestimates the circumstance that, although requested by a private party, the access to personal data is ordered by a judge. Would the AG apply the same kind of test to other areas of EU law?
Hair: (Fur) Brown.
This little piggy went to market...and made it big in porkbellies!
from 'Home Library" by Zoran Zivkovic as found in his short story collection The Library
Based on the Edgar Rice Burroughs novel Princess of Mars, John Carter is the third most expensive film ever produced. Disney really swung for the fences with this one. It opened to mediocre reviews (51% on rotten tomatoes) and disappointing box office results (at least for a film that cost $250 million to make). So is it worth your time and money?
It's almost midnight. Looks like they made it through another year.
And again: Harry Bingham – the first writer threatened with legal action – has posted a definitive list of questions raised about the Brit Writers Awards.
The brief five-paragraph ruling from the appeals court upheld the recommendation of the trial court in Cherokee County, where a judge denied Cobb any legal relief after an evidentiary hearing.
Hopefully, after watching Annabelle make bouffants and gowns, rocket ships and pirate ships, the reader will see that she is a girl who never gives up on the idea of being herself.
Now I’m not the first to write a post about how to dress a ‘maid, and I’m certainly not going to be the last. It’s a subject that divides brides across the land and a question to which there is no right or wrong answer. But- and this is a big but (and I cannot lie)- it is a junction in the long and winding road to Weddingsville where people can turn one way in to Style Central, or the other way in to Naff City, Naffington.
May mercy, peace and love be mine in full measure in Christ Jesus, Amen!
Recipes Bookmarked
1. Science is the only valid way to gain knowledge. Nothing about God is needed to explain the world. Eventually science will uncover all mysteries. Those that it can't explain don't exist.
You know the soap dispenser that magically gets filled?
Jon asked me to write an essay on unschooling by tempting me with this provocative prompt:
and I will be happy.
The “Top End” penalty for “disrepute” for an official is listed as is a £10,000 fine. The maximum is stated to be a £50,000 fine. Page 102 of the Protocol, which carries these provisions and the penalties mentions that expulsion is one of the sanctions available, but in the chart which accompanies that text, the only class of individual stated to be at risk of expulsion is a referee found guilty of bringing the game into disrepute.
Hopefully I'll be back on-line soon, in the meantime, enjoy the podcast!
Bantum stood thinking for a while. Then he said, “That sounds reasonable. Ok.”
On Wednesday night at 7:30, I’m going to introduce Buzz. He'll read from the book, and he and I will have a conversation about FATHER’S DAY before turning it over to the audience.
Leila Ixchel
put it in a box for the rummage sale,
Richard Heathcote, who lives opposite the site, said the invaders have begun clearing right over Umgeni Water’s pipeline. “The police are doing nothing.”
"The MAGOOS News!"
That's the only part I think is exciting & fun & would make anyone push faster!
We are staying at Shunko-in Temple www.shunkoin.com (check out their site – it’s in English and really great). It is part of the large Myoshin-ji Temple complex in Northwestern Kyoto, which is the largest of Japan’s 14 Rinzai sects – Zen Buddist. I thought we hit the jackpot as we walked through the complex looking for our little piece of heaven. But actually the room was somewhat dissapointing. It’s tiny, which I expected, but it has some fairly ugly grey (clean, just grey colored) carpet, not tatami. I guess it’s understandable since they cater to foriegners who wouldn’t know how to treat tatami…. we are also right next to the showers and then the toilets. We’ll see how well we sleep. There are only 4 rooms so it might be ok. You can hardly walk around the futons to get to the little desk and 1 chair. But it’s clean, has wifi, and I’m looking foward to the zen meditation class in the morning.
Grade: 3 1/2 Burps.
original location of Chez Moeder Lambic in 2006, they
2. Turtle beans fresh bath, heuchera mordanted yarn (1/5)
because there are some major changes in my life right now..
This is probably one of the simplest busy bags to put together. Here is what you need:
Additionally, Ann Dunham was an operational cyberneticist like Dr. Bateson. She was involved in helping setup microeconomic (micro financing) systems in Pakistan, India and New York for the Ford Foundation.[63] Microeconomics and microeconomic systems are forms of cybernetics.[64] Economic Cybernetics can be covertly used by old colonial powers, ruling classes, oligarchies, and the NWO to centrally control and rule nations and populations.
Polyunsaturated fats are helpful in their own right, but a subset of polys, called omega-3 fatty acids, are amazing multi-taskers, simultaneously combating several heart disease risk factors.
Here we come to Lebanon, and it is needed that by the summer end a neutral cabinet will be approved by the parliament to supervise two things, the state budget of 2013 and the general elections of the parliament.
"Ummah" is the word for community in Arabic and when I listen to the music of these cats, I feel like I am part of the community ...a community of LOVE's MUSIC...
This morning I made a quick language arts activity to sort common and proper nouns. I didn't want to make this activity too easy, so I didn't include any capital letters in the sort. Nothing like a capital letter to give the answer away! The students just sort the bones under the correct heading. Then they would use a sheet of paper to record their answers, being sure to capitalize the proper nouns. I think I would then have them use each of the words in a complete sentence.
I was raised a devout Roman Catholic. My mother was born and lived in Ireland until her marriage to my father — a union which happened to coincide with Hitler’s invasion of Poland. Having been swept off her feet by this handsome American, what relevance could a Blitzkrieg possibly have to my mother’s life?
Furthermore teams have also allowed the front wing to flex downwards at speed to allow it to get closer to the ground, further improving its performance. Although meeting the FIA deflection tests, teams are allowing the wing bend and twist to position the endplate into a better orientation, either for sealing the wing to the ground or directing airflow towards the front tyres wake. Both creating downforce benefits at the front or rear of the car, respectively.
While it is true that not everyone is destined to be the school beauty queen or coolest kid on the block, no child should be should have the misfortune of being made (at the hands of their parents) into the class misfit or local social reject. There are plenty of affordable discount stores like Ross, Walmart, The Warehouse or even second-hand stores where parents can purchase children’s clothing that is reasonably stylish and looks like it comes from this decade.
KRIS: Okay then. (Tries it.) AUUUUUGHHH! THIS ISN’T SPAGHETTI!
Rnd 2) ch2,(does not count as first st now and through out) 2dc in same st and in each st around, sl st to top of first dc made. (22dc)
The defense starts at linebacker with two solid senior performers, Tony Gilbert and Boss Bailey. Tony was the leading tackler from last year’s ball club and both bring valuable experience to the heart of the group. Look for a great competition this coming August to find out who figures into the depth chart rotations.
Let us consider that judgment. There is something far worse than physical death? If you die without the salvation of Jesus Christ you will face that fiery indignation, which is the judgment of God.
4. Music- essential ingredient or distraction- discuss
I enjoyed the graphic novel/chapter book style, which keeps readers engaged and is perfect for young adolescents who can be hard to keep engaged. I do think that it’s necessary to read the first two books before progressing on to this one, as there isn’t much explanation or backstory given and the book is much more enjoyable if you have already gotten to know the characters.
Than goodness it turned out well!
Once it is kitted out with stove and bookshelves and nicknacks and pictures and pots and pans and hanging things and carpets and teapots and paintbrushes and laptops and instruments and brooms and pillows and plants and ...
There are many moving parts that must all come together in a very harmonized fashion in order for your food to be delivered to you in less than 2 minutes. There must be constant communication between each of the stations relaying what their needs are and what each team member can do. Without a flawless communication system, the whole train would slow down, leading to decreased efficiency.
#3 – Elisha DEMONSTRATED APPRECIATION AND GRATITUDE. Elisha didn’t take the woman’s kindness for granted. When someone takes the time to show us love and kindness, we should express our thankfulness. Remember: Gratitude is never INVISIBLE or SILENT. Just as we don’t want to miss the opportunity to serve others, we also don’t want to miss the opportunity to thank others. So, who has gone the extra mile for you? How can you tangibly express your appreciation for them?
Go for it!
Ace has a long, thoughtful post looking at Obama's tendency to vote "present," then take credit for whatever happened next, and how well or poorly this approach works for an executive: Obama the Passive-Aggressive Coward. Obama gives a speech studded with claims about his own "boldness" while punting on all the important issues and only offering cute-sounding, poll-tested anecdotes about the wonders of government intervention. Solar shingles! Fuel made from sunlight and water! High speed trains!
ALL times are Eastern Timezone
John carried with him a piece—in many cases a very large piece—to the puzzle of each of our lives. He carried it and he presented it to us . . . freely . . . wisely . . . gently . . . joyously, and yet, it seemed, all unknowingly, just by virtue of his presence in a room with us, just as a part of his errand. The pieces of our lives that John carried for us and carried to us—each of such a different shape (so many distinctive errands)—each piece helped reveal to us the contours of who we were, the outline of what we lacked, the totality of what we could be and perhaps were meant to be. We hold those pieces now, and carry John’s presence in them.
Giggles escaped from the other girls.
You see the British National Party or at least many of its activists became too big for their boots, amongst other nationalists they strutted, their way or no way and indeed we have thee greatest number, thee most professional and most visited website and our ideological shift has garnered political success, whilst you, the old guard, the extreme, the fascists (sic), you succeeded in nothing, we are now the movement and you must join or fall upon your sword. Yet for we, those who simply could not join in such premature celebration, we who counselled caution or indeed realised that the success garnered at the polling booth did not equate to political reawakening, we became pariah, enemy number one and indeed into the morass of stupidity other groups or individuals stepped.
There is NO WAY I'm letting my son catch a glimpse at the ridiculous room Chris at Just a Girl created for her son. I just know that he'd somehow convince me it was time for another room makeover. So I'll just quietly drool over her masterpiece by myself.
There's a saying that people will do anything to keep their secrets and there is a passage in the book that proves that saying without a doubt.
I was afraid he was going to break up with me.
A Cooling Drink of Water
The report makes some highly questionable claims on Wales's transport system and makes the basis for the bid a building rather than financial expertise plus its difficult to read because it's so full of flannel - did Edwina or her Department chief see this report before it was sent?
I drove home content with the events of the past 24 hours, and excited about the next 24 hours to come-- Christmas with my family. I drove straight to my parents' home, and got in around 5:30with plenty of time to spare before our Christmas Eve dinner. My dad's cousin Michael and his mother, my great-Aunt Holly, were already making themselves at home. Michael is 57, and successfully bridges the generation gap between myself and my folks. He was wearing a blue t-shirt that had a hole in the back. Michael, did you know your shirt is holy?
And another of our FAVORITE outdoor activites on these beautiful days...SCOOTERS (and perhaps Santa's best gift yet!) I cannot believe how fast this kid is either. Oh my GOSH!! He's really good at it, and has so much fun!
so My husband and me decided not to go and finally we went to a downtown of my area :)
d) for this particular giveaway, YOU MUST BE A RIKRAK studio follower or subscriber,
Overheard during Hay's job search:
1 Cor 16:19 (NIV) The churches in the province of Asia send you greetings. Aquila and Priscilla greet you warmly in the Lord, and so does the church that meets at their house.
Ms. Paul
Today, I proudly posted my goal on Facebook, to hold myself more accountable.
We go in.
In all you do and say
My world awaits you with bated breath.
You: Hey, Amy...kinda late today, aren't we?
Thank you for filling me to overflowing to empty me again and again in Your perfect will.
561440 Collection agencies
A new survey by eDigitalResearch and IMRG has revealed that almost 9 out of 10 consumers feels that the new EU cookie directive is a positive step. But the majority of those who took part in the survey did not know what cookies were before the survey team gave an explanation.
First and foremost, I wanted to THANK everyone that commented on my posts over the weekend! I was touched by your comments... they were all so dear and kind!! I wish I could give everyone some Blog Candy that left a comment, but then I wouldn't have any $$ for crafts!! Hahhaha...
4. The word “dude” in The Big Lebowski is used approximately 161 times in the movie: 160 times spoken and once in text (in the credits for “Gutterballs” the second dream sequence). The F-word or a variation of the F-word is used 292 times. The Dude says “man” 147 times in the movie—that’s nearly 1.5 times a minute.
Often the thickest part of the hatch has come at the windiest times. but you can get them. Wotton’s Adult Caddis, Headlight Caddis, the E/C Caddis and everyday Elk Hairs are doing well _ size 16 seems to be the flavor. You can also do well fishing late in the day. On low water the dry fly fishing should be very good.
We ventured out to the Chesapeake Children's Museum today with a bunch of friends, not knowing what to expect. We ended up having a great time. Upon arrival, we were worried based on the appearance of the dilapidated house, but we were pleasantly surprised when we walked in. There were several different rooms that had various important elements that were linked to the Chesapeake bay.
Icelandic women are also fairly well-off compared to other countries. Women in Iceland have a life expectance of 82.9 years and Japanese women, according to statistics from the United Nations, live almost 86 years on average.
Aren't they cheerful? I'm thinking I may need at least one of these lovely watercolors for my sewing room! Unless one of y'all get to them first--Tracie has good prices, and she'll ship all over. (She does pet portraits, too--OMG SO ADORABLE--I encourage you to check her blog out! Each picture takes you to Tracie's blog, where you can also see the flowers in much better detail.)
Connery’s second outing remains one of the best Bonds going, featuring an intelligent and well thought out plot about a SPECTRE plan to steal a Russian decoding device, all the while playing the Brits and Russians off against each other. It features excellent performances all round, with Connery at his early 60s best, the near silent Robert Shaw as the menacing assassin and of course, Lotte Lenya as the unforgettable Rosa Klebb. To some, this is the quintessential Bond, retaining the gritty realism of Dr. No but also introducing several staples such as the opening sequence, Robert Llewelyn, Blofeld, and helicopter chases. The plot makes sense, the gadgetry is appropriate, the characters are fleshed out and the action is realistic, while Connery is as suave as ever. The only slight complaint I have is the occasional slow pacing, particularly on the train, and the Gypsy scenes were somewhat out of left field, which is why it just gets pipped to the post…
They see bleeding through their lives
the big ol' U turn that you do, when you see a potential piece on the side of the road! The one where the kids say, "Mom, don't stop! You have the fleeting thought that you might be a little crazy, but the pitter patter in the ol thumper starts pittering a little faster, and patttering a little harder, and you just HAVE to stop. Pull a Uuy and jump out....throw the piece into the car, and live with the consequences of the eye rolls, and husband's jeering when you get home. And you say....
(d) leaves meetings, religious services, movies, ER under guise of restroom use to check on blogs of self and others
Maybe way, way, way back.
there’s nothing much to save
We asked around a few people on the train if they new the terminal for Tower Air but no one had ever even heard of it. We arrived at the airport, got some hearty good-bye cheek kisses from our friend in the orange jumpsuit and exited the train. Now I was so worried about making our flight and getting on without tickets that my body seemed to have forgot it was food poisoned.
# : 32 Suzi - your colouring of the image and the sparkle were beautiful!
What would you say to Abraham?
Moon nodded his head in genuine appreciation for this flurry of wordy words.
Hops: "three varieties"
However, it’s not just comments made in work time that can lead to dismissal. In Gosden v Lifeline Products Ltd an employee was found to have been fairly dismissed for sending a racist and offensive chain email from his home computer to the home computer of a colleague who worked for one of his employer’s largest clients. The offensive email then entered the client’s email system. The tribunal concluded that the employer’s reputation with a significant client had been damaged and the dismissal for gross misconduct was upheld.
painted with feathers
Bleh.
But back to Smyrna.
WITNESS: We do.
Cutest?
The nurse explained that it would actually be impossible for me to go to the bathroom, since the baby was blocking everything; she said the sensation was caused by the baby moving down into my pelvis.
- If you had to show off about your company as SM trainees?
The gathering of the souls for birth,
For those on the outside, like me
There are other reasons – I could cheerfully throttle the Sinn Fein bod who thought of describing this as the “Austerity Treaty” because regardless of whether or not the referendum is passed, we still need cuts and new taxes totalling €8bn over the next three years. That is an almighty adjustment in a country that thinks it has already seen pain. It’s an average of €5,000 per household per year – it mightn’t be new taxes, it might be reduced services, but the average cost of the adjustment from 2013-2015 is in that order. Voting “no” won’t remove the need for this State to balance its books over time, and from where we are starting now, that will mean more austerity – Fiscal Compact or no Fiscal Compact. We can try to stimulate growth and carry through reforms but most of the adjustment is likely to come from austerity. And for the next 18 months at least, we will have the Troika poking around our finances with quarterly reviews as well as weekly/daily reporting, so close international oversight of our finances hasn’t been a disaster.
Society today postures homosexuality as simply an “alternative lifestyle”. Disney World hosts an annual “Gay Pride Day”. Parades are held to honor homosexuality. Some schools even teach homosexuality as a lifestyle in their sex education classes. If God loves homosexuals, why do some Christians have a problem with these things?
Sure, it doesn’t look like much but you’re never going to see it except when you put it in or take it out. It has eight cores in there. It’s pretty fast. Best of all, it works.
The great RuPaul once said, "We're born naked, and the rest is drag." This nugget of wisdom could also be applied to Ingrid Thulin's animated turn as Kitty Kellermann, the world's most enthusiastic brothel keeper. Boasting the temperament of a nonsensical drag queen and the fashion sense of visually impaired ragpicker, Ingrid's performance is camp personified. The word "fabulous" might seem like an apt way to describe Ingrid's work in Salon Kitty, but even it doesn't even come close to doing it justice. Singing, dancing, slapping, crying, writhing, yelling, drinking, and eating (she angrily bites a chunk out of a discarded bread-based dildo at one point), Ingrid Thulin does it all. My crotch-centric inclinations may have been all about Rosemarie Lindt and her ample behind, but my inner dandy was secretly longing to go shopping with Ingrid.
Older than her years and completely alone, Temple is trying to live one day at a time in a post-apocalyptic world, where the undead roam endlessly, and the remnants of mankind seem, at times, to retain little humanity themselves.
The Ryobi handheld cordless drill is another popular brand in the marketplace today that delivers the power and reliability people are looking for when looking to purchase a cordless drill. It works excellently to hold screwdriver tips and drill bits in place. When you purchase a Ryobi 18v cordless drill, you’ll get a battery, a charger and a case plus a dual-headed screw bits. It uses the specific Ryobi 18V battery system and has a keyless chuck.
He gives a brief laugh. “I did go out when I was younger. But you grow up.”
Trevor
a VEVO Channel. VEVO, a
We did a road race on Thanksgiving morning, and I am still thinking about how fast Dan's stepdad is! I tried to keep up with him and Jeremy, but just couldn't do it. What speed demons! The race was in Long grove Illinois, and what a cute little town! I told mom and Heather, that if they could see it, they would move there in a heart beat. It reminded me a little of Harry Potter or something like that.
When we reached the Fort Canning Centre, we were given a special 30 - 45 minutes talk on Ayurveda. Ayurveda means "Wisdom of Life". This talk gave the tour participants a quick introduction to Ayurveda. I was impressed with the centuries of wisdom that had laid the foundation behind Ayurveda. It is not just a science of treatment, it is also a science of how to live life well.
On the site, you can read the requests for pictures by the prisoners. Some ask for family photos, others ask for Jesus. Or, like the above picture, some want images of themselves dropped into a background that highlights hope, love, or something more. A few men just want something funny to look at. It’s strange to think about a photograph as a privilege, but when you’re denied everything else, a single image can be the difference between salvation and insanity. If you want to pitch in (and maybe change someone’s life), join me in sending photos by following this link.
I painted the letter with acrylic paint & spritzed it with some home made glimmer mist (pearlizing medium, warm water, & Mod Podge in a spray bottle).
The rationale in legalizing drugs is supposedly if you legalize “drugs”, that will curb the violence and the need for as much incarceration of our citizens. Thats like putting a band-aid on a gun shot wound to the heart. That is simply not the answer. It will be a very temporary fix. I believe personally putting more emphasis on educating and providing options early, will give some of these young people, who have untapped skills a different path to choose. If they are beyond that, put more emphasis on rehabilitating non-violent offenders so they don’t get caught in the virtual endless cycle of the revolving door of the system.
I got lost a few more times (Im guessing this will continue for a while)
Even she was nothing in comparison to the woman who was standing in the water and looking at him.
The year is 1848, and Kristin Eikaas has traveled from Norway to Wisconsin with dreams of a new life. But when she arrives, she finds one disappointment after another. Worse, her superstitious uncle now believes that his neighbor’s Oneida Indian wife has put a curse on Kristin. Everyone knows the Sundbergs put spells on people…
Residential Architecture: Tiltpanel House by Irving Smith Jack Architects: “..Conceived to provide a durable, cost efficient and thermally sustainable house solution for a young and creative family, the Tiltpanel House was developed using a commercial approach to fabricating buildings with preformed insulated concrete panels. The industrial structure was then domesticated with applied layering of texture and light to soften and warm as a family home..The weight of the concrete perimeter is softened and de-scaled with layers of light and texture applied internally and externally against the smooth sanded concrete walls. Varying glazing opacities pattern and articulate light and view while hung western cedar screening overprints and manipulates shadow. Internally plywood ceilings and joinery then provide natural texture and warmth, with flat finished sheet linings contrasting the imperfection of the concrete..” Views, glazing, repurposed commercial approach to building fabrication, indoor/outdoor sensibility, wood, concrete..
A constitutional amendment to ban gay marriage is, in my opinion a ridiculous waste of time. (I also think it is only a political smokescreen, but that is another matter). What are we actually talking about anyway? A homosexual couple who want to live together and act as a married couple can already do so almost anywhere in the US. Sure, there are places where they would catch more hassle than other places, but even in those places the “state” would defend their rights as consenting adults to live as they please. So actually, what we are talking about is the “official” recognition of their “partnership” or “union” or “pick a name”, by the state.
¾pint custard
There was no buildings between me and the zombies. Well, none that weren't obviously overrun. As I got closer I began picking them off, taking careful but quick aim, and making every bullet count. Damn! I missed one. Shake it off. Breathe. Aim...got it. Lever in another round. Aim...shoot. Lever. Aim...shoot.
“Dear 17 year old brother, so wise yet so, so stupid.” –ouch, that boy sure knows how to hit it to you. “Tell her while you still can or forever live your life with a regret of wondering what might have been.”
To be my support
As I write this, the news just broke that the very first two lawsuits against the new law have been filed. These opening salvos came from the National Coalition of Latino Clergy and Christian Leaders, and a Tucson police officer. The story is here.
This book pulls together some of my most favorite things, weaving a new story with new characters and depths. As I read, I felt growing satisfaction… that THIS is what I had always hoped for and didn't even know it.
“What will the doctor do to help her?”
Lamenting the loss of food skills in our culture has become a cliched refrain, but it’s also absolutely correct. Industrial food culture, of course, encourages this de-skilling—how else to sell more Big Macs, frozen chicken nuggets and Lite Delite Dinners? And the worst part of all is the impact it’s had on our health—and the health of our children.
Before deciding on a glass of the popular sports in italy, GSM Italy cell phone, you do that. You may end up paying a very high roaming rates. Making telephone calls from your hotel room is another expensive way to be available to you by your home service provider, you are in Florence, appreciating the popular sports in italy of its most famous sights.
Why are villains so damn sexy?
~new lighting
I wrote a short post a few weeks ago entitled Love what you Hate, but I thought I'd expand on it a little here as I think it's an important part of the 30 Steps to Happiness and Contentment I'm currently writing as part of the National Blog Post Month.
If you first please yourself and know you're okay,
I tried to burn it down and build a better me.
Marketers, and all you students of the market, are aware of what's been called the "Pretty Good problem". Time was, choice was a real issue for the consumer. We were, once, confronted by a heap of shoddy, sub-standard, adulterated and unsafe products, with a few quality items offering honest value for money. The problem then was to identify those valuable items and avoid being tricked into spending our money on crap.
I'm not against bringing the rich and their tax receipts downtown, but let's leave the ones who don't have enough taste to avoid this 31-story doo doo log to Williamson County.
But this is not what needs to be going on in my head at this moment. This guy doesn’t need an essay, he needs a response. Do I give it to him and go home? Do I keep it and defy the very logic I used with my wife to justify coming here this afternoon?
- In a bowl mix minced meat, salt, pepper and tomato choped in small pices.
After I had sanded until my arm felt like it was going to fall off, I applied a coat of Minwax's water-based Polycrylic Protective Finish in Clear Semi Gloss. (To read why, see my sewing cabinet makeover.)
- Chart of English History, from B.C. 1100 to A.D. 1852 (15th Ed.), and
06 How Many More Times
Let's keep talking coupons for a moment shall we? Where do you find all of money saving deals? Any couponing tips and tricks for us soft core couponers? What storage methods work best for you?
His satirical street art and subversive epigrams combine irreverent dark humour with graffiti done in a distinctive stencilling technique. Such artistic works of political and social commentary have been featured on streets, walls, and bridges of cities throughout the world.
You see, its not a problem, such sly slips are common when the object of the story is to not subjectively debate the pros and cons of the amendment but to provide a one-sided view that reinforces the existing paradigm, that being, “women are always the victim”. Thats why she is being accused of being biased and not following her journalistic fiduciary role.
My mom and stepdad, my stepmother, grandmother, and 2 sisters came by to visit us and to bring presents. Presents are always fun, no matter how sick you are. My sisters stayed with me until 10. even though I'm on the contagious side. We pigged out on icecream cake and cookie cake. I didn't even eat dinner. I ate cake and now I'm really sick.
neighbors sitting on their porches
That was the one moment that started this whole post. The value of that one simple greeting. Five letters were enough to make me smile even just for a moment. What I wouldn’t give to know if she is missing me the way I am missing her. What I wouldn’t give to know whenever she’s thinking about me. Ooh, I would give a lot. Haha. Even something as simple as a “hi”. But you know, if she wanted to follow up with “hello, I miss you quite terribly” like the lyric, that’s also very appreciated. That’s less likely to happen though.
The report, signed by Deloitte director Roy Shough, found that most of the conflict between the board and executive arose over the axing of Dali Mpofu as SABC group chief executive .
I loved the videos, and loved the discussions, but when I sat down to tackle the readings associated with the lecture, I realized that much of what was in there was not remotely addressed in any cognitive sense in class. While I learn well enough from reading, I do find I learn best with a combination of audio and visual stimuli and, ideally, a concrete example of a theory via discussion. Our Life Skills course was a perfect blend of just that; this first class, however, had jumped straight to examples and assumed understanding of the logic beneath. It was like traversing a highway without road signs: I can guess the speed and which exit I need to take, but who’s to blame if the cops yank me over and tell me I was doing 100km/h in an 80km/h zone? All students need a few guiding markers to keep us on track.
I’ve been living in Southern California now for going on six years and I have yet to have traveled to this adult Disneyland in the desert. Mainly, because I have a good feeling it will all be bullshit. I truly wonder if there is anything there worth doing if you’re not Hunter S. Thompson style drunk, which is to say, fucking shit-faced. My wife is certainly not the gambling type. She has told me she plans on standing behind me when I decide to throw some of our money away. This in part nixes a good amount of time we could spend shoveling pennies into slots and throwing dice to our inevitable grief. Why go to Vegas if you’re not going to gamble? Well, there are shows, and restaurants and amusements! Granted, if I want some really good food I don’t exactly live in the best city for it, but I don’t think it warrants a drive out to Las Vegas.
Why a known-mobster like De Pedis is buried on the grounds of a Vatican church has been the object of much speculation since 1997, when a church maid revealed the tomb’s existence to an inquisitive journalist. The Vatican was always cagey about why the mobster was buried in one of its churches, and ultimately, the church’s silence spurred countless conspiracy theories. Now, thanks to shocking Vatican letters leaked in the Vatileaks scandal that is rocking the Holy See, the Italian police are less interested in why he’s buried there. Instead, they want to open the tomb to see if the remains of 15-year-old Emanuela Orlandi are interred with those of the mobster.And this:
f) The budget focused on prisons would be revised so that more money could be spent on higher education –i.e. as of right now the state of California spends $8,667 per student per year, while nearly $50,000 per inmate per year.
I realise there are many jobs where jobsharing may not be practical, but equally so there are many where it could work very well. With continuing population growth, plus the fact that people are living 10 – 20 years longer, it is clear that business and job creation alone, cannot keep up. With jobs declining worldwide, making the most of what is available is a viable option. We need to reinvent the daily working wheel.
This week I'm going to be focused on making some very different things. But I always like to have stuff for the kiddies.
Okay, call me a fan geek, food geek, whatever, but I was on cloud 9 all day over this silly tweet. Over the fact that one of my chef heroes tweeted me back and actually seemed bummed that he wasn't able to see me. Does it matter how truly bummed he was? No. Not to a fan. When you admire and respect someone you're excited to be acknowledged by that person. And you should be. Life is too short not to get excited over the little things.
That aside, there is another option to the thought about Portable Applications: TrueCrypt. This is a piece of open source software (so, free and available for Windows, Linux and Mac) which allows you to create a virtual drive. For those of you not down with the nerds, it basically a chunk of your hard disk that pretends to be a proper drive letter or mount point (Mac/Linux). However, as TrueCrypt is fully encrypted, no one can get into it without the right password and you can make that as complicated as you like.
Type 3: Non-organized:
I can’t believe Yarra Trams received an email that ended with “…if you could respond as entertainingly as I have complained, I would be most grateful” and didn’t put it in the “arrogant fuckwit” outbox AND had a crack at responding entertainingly AND consummately nailed it AND found a balance between humour and facts AND satisfied pretty much every one of my concerns.
Commissioner of Police
� Disposition of Steam Plant
*Leona Lewis – Better In Time
This baby has had a strange and profound effect on me though. I'll put this simply; I'm not really fond of babies...but I'm fond of her.
UPS’ disappointing earnings have us more on edge than the GDP numbers as growth may be slowing worldwide. Overall we think that today may be a throwaway day. Last day of the quarter and last day of a very full news week may have investors looking to take a rest (and leave early). The bulls need to close two consecutive days above 1400 on the S&P and that could bring in more investors from the sidelines and so Monday may be the key. Barring a strong move by the bulls we may still be stuck in our trading range. Watch the news wires after the bell. Friday’s of a busy news week are usually a great day to sneak in some bad news and hope everyone left early for the weekend.
I think sometimes we take life for granted and don’t realize we are NOT promised tomorrow. Each day is truly a gift from God and each day should be treated like it is the last day we have.
Paris, 28 June, 9.45pm
I'm thankful for......
The first before care worker who approached Teagan was also named Elizabeth!
Other "mini miracles" from this month include:
From Amazon:
Don't worry, you won't only get the fantastic guilt trip above, you also get this:
(Brooklyn, Dec. 7, 2009) - This week, Bridge Cleaners & Tailors will kick off the National Cleaners Association’s annual “Coats for Kids” drive. The mission of Coats for Kids is simple - anyone in need of a coat will have one. Bridge Cleaners & Tailors, a premiere dry cleaner located in downtown Brooklyn is accepting gently used kid, adult and baby sized winter coats from December 7, 2009 – January 31, 2010. This will start Coats for Kids 25th year of service. Coats collected will be donated to the Brooklyn Bureau of Community Services.
Delano – The California Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation (CDCR) announced today that Kern Valley State Prison (KVSP) investigators are working with the Kern County Coroner and District Attorney’s Office to investigate the Christmas Day death of an inmate, which has been classified as a homicide.
During his many years of turmoil I often played the 'bad guy' in the family structure. I absolutely refused to enable his destructive behaviour. I did help when he was clean, but when he was not I just couldn't. Whether this was beneficial or helpful is not important. If someone is determined to self-destruct no level of support is truely appropriate. You can't fix what people don't want fixed. You can't heal them, shield them, you simply cannot love someone back to whole. sorry, it doesn't work that way. Makes a good story, a compelling movie, but i can find no evidence to support this practice. Anyway, I was called by another brother this morning, and given the news. We don't know why, and that is also irrelevant. If ever someone was on borrowed time, it was Frankie Joe. I do not know why I was so calm and seemingly unperturbed by this event. It is true that he no longer suffers, that he is at peace, and that the days of worrying about his welfare are over. I should like to believe he rests in his mother's arms in heaven, but who can say. He was a pleasant man, friendly and people genuinely liked him. He also stole, lied, and did how many unspeakable acts we shall never know. Such is the live of many an addict. My own near-death experiences have offered no clue as to an afterlife. It was just a shutdown. A life stoppage. My faith is shaky at best, and under constant change as i redefine my belief structure to suit my mood. So i cannot say what has become of this blonde haired blue-eyed boy. The one who struggled his whole life. It seems so cruel to live a life of such hardship. Did he know how awful was his existence? I once drove past a pan handler at an intersection who looked like him. Because it was him. I was in my Jaguar. That will mess with your head. if not then, later on. Hello therapy.
40 3mm Bicone bead (white/transparent)
5 radishes
One year and six months later and I ate my first McDonald’s hamburger since eliminating fast food. I ate about a third and couldn’t finish the rest. Something about greasy, over-processed meat just wasn’t appetizing anymore.
What this means to me and you is that backpacking no longer needs to demand shelving your creature comforts to adopt smelly dreds, ‘hippy’ or ‘gypsy’ rag clothing and finger-staining rollies.
Welcome, Mr Hodgson. We haven’t been expecting you. If there was a fug of unexpected excitement around a drizzle-draped Wemble y Stadium on Tuesday afternoon before the enthroning of Roy Hodgson as England’s 13th full-time manager, this was perhaps as much to do with the paucity of expectation previously, the anti‑fanfare that had accompanied this most soft‑pedalled of England appointments. In fact, so muted was the reaction in the popular press it was tempting to wonder beforehand if Hodgson might use his first public appearance to get it all over with right now and announce his immediate resignation from the job. Hodgson: “I’ve taken this team as far as I can. I’d like to thank the fans for supporting me. Fan. Whatever.”
Then, AFTER you have subscribed (or if you ALREADY subscribed in which case, YAY!) please COMMENT on THIS post using the SAME email address in the info field, or, if you’re a WordPress blog user, the link to your blog (so I can tell who’s who).
You can read all the details and see the other design team's creations on the Pages blog post here. If you are in the Monrovia area you can also stop by the store and check out all of the samples. It's a beautiful store located in the heart of downtown Monrovia. Stay tuned for the next reveal plus some other stuff I've been working on!
It was a tender scene filled with love for one another and caring and sharing the load, so-to-speak. He wasn't asked to come and help, he just saw a need and filled it. Amazing.
In theory, the Maoists are said to be smart, bright chaps who have sacrificed the good life to fight on behalf of tribals who are raped, kidnapped, and killed, and whose resources exploited, pillaged and robbed etc, without justice from the systems and processes that independent India has put in place.
My second fav is Cole. Yeah, he does a stupid thing in the beginning, but he really is sweet and you can tell he cares for those around him. He is generally worried about taking care of people and making sure they are okay.
This building can be visited today and is contained within the Musée de Cluny. This museum, which concentrates largely on one person's collection of artefacts from the middle-ages, is housed in the 15th century Hôtel de Cluny, itself an exceptional and rare example of gothic architecture in Paris. It is interesting to see how this Hôtel was built around and on top of the previous Roman structure, and parts of the brickwork from the 'thermes' can still be seen on the left-hand side of the entrance courtyard.
January 2 - Pete Postlethwaite, actor ("The Usual Suspects"), 64
Nicole: why did you send me that?
A short time later we were riding one Sunday afternoon April 30, 1961 just a couple of blocks from home. It was a beautiful spring day, sunny and warm. I had stopped momentarily near the crest of a hill on Rittenhouse Street to adjust the buckle on a shoe I was wearing. I hopped back on and began peddling fast and furious in my effort to catch up. A short distance ahead I watched Michael coast down the short hill and pass through an “uncontrolled” intersection with no stop signs, at the bottom. Suddenly a car driven by a local well-known plumber, John C. Dorsey, came through the intersection from the left and struck Michael on his bicycle. I still remember vividly the sound of his bike as it broke into pieces and watching Michael’s body thrown across the street and fall to the lawn of a corner house.
It's always difficult to decide which I think I like better when it comes to beer and whisky when I get asked. I always like to say they're two different arms of the same chair.
I’m pretty much decided – the silver lining to this decidedly unpredictable weather, is the light. I’ve said it before and I’ll say it again: shafts of light breaking through thick, dark storm clouds makes for some interesting photography! The white stone seems to glow when the sun light is directly on it, and the backdrop of the coming storm is, to me, provides a great ‘natural contrast’ to the scene.
This little lady was checking out a grape leaf in Napa Valley!
1 cheeks
Peace…MissRandom
I know, some of you may be wondering why that matters so much.
I’m also working on the December release in the MOA series. Killing Hannah has been a long time in the making actually so I am happy to be getting back to work on it. I have my research cut out for me as my lead female is smarter than I am on the subject matter and I would really like for her to come across as being knowledgeable. But at the same time there’s a bit of a twist in this book that allows me to just make stuff up without it coming off as too “unrealistic.” I’m wrapping up the last leg of that government conspiracy in this book and anything can happen. Don’t worry; it’s not the last book in the series. I still have Adam’s brothers’ story to get back to work on, and there were a couple guys mentioned in previous books that actually have a story going so I would like to incorporate those into the series as well. 2013 will see more Men of Action.
Our next challenge here at the Sisterhood is going to be quite easy. All you have to do is create a card or project using at least one flower on it. I don't know about you but using just one flower is kind of like trying to eat just one Lays potato chip! ; )
"Shh, it's an honor they speak to you so frequently. Only kings of the Reparation get such
Our summer was a little too cool for heat loving crops like squash, so our harvest will be smaller than usual, but they'll still make for some yummy soups, stews, and desserts (and maybe even a jack-o-lantern or two).
PS- In case you missed it: We are walking in the Buddy Walk in Balboa Park on October 15th. Anyone who is interested in joining us is certainly welcome. We also are looking for people to donate! Follow the link below to donate. If you are interested in walking please sign up to walk with the “Temecula Valley Support Group”.
Such stunning cards ladies, make sure you grab our Top 3 logo above and we hope to see you again next week!
I think you get the picture.
the first
I realize that the last two pages might have not been as exciting as you would of hoped, but I’m not looking to bore you either. Be a little patient as the ripple caused by my knee injury would change all my hopes and dreams and most of all, my life.
Lila is snoring over the monitor after finally going to sleep for her nap. I had to lay on the floor of her nursery for 15 minutes to get her to stop bringing books into her bed and go to sleep. When do toddlers go from sweet baby sounds in their sleep to grown up snoring noises? I do not remember the moment when that changes.
Here’s why I think Dad led me to think of myself as an entrepreneur — HE ALWAYS HATED THAT JOB. I’m pretty confident that he hated it for the almost 30 years. How in the hell does one do something that he hates for 30 or so years? Probably because he loves his family, see the above fed and clothed reason. However, even with my dad’s commitment to a job he hated because it had a good pension and good benefits, yada, yada – I sometimes think, Sh*t, we struggled anyway. He should’ve done something he loved.
If England counts with you, for she is weak;
The key to make this nail art stand out more is to choose contrasting colors. Though in this case, i wasn't able to since i just decided to make do with what i have on my nails when i did it. I used my Midnight Fantasy as a base.
I might have a photography shoot in Kansas IF I do well today. I am taking pictures for my uncle so he can see how I do in low lighting. I'm doing my test shoot today to see how I do: wish me luck!!
But what about the online patterns?
No one ever asked me what I’m going to do with my story now.
Fuller Smith & Turner PLC Fuller's ESB
How did I accumulate so much stuff? Well, that will have to be another blog post… I am already planning it out… the title will be “The psychology of debt…” with a brief preview being this, when I finally got to a place where I could afford to purchase things I did. I purchased a lot of stuff – I shopped in an attempt to fill my empty life and buy the love that I was not receiving at home. Sad I know, but true none-the-less.
Also, should you believe that the hosepipe ban affects my property I would be happy to enter negotiations with you on the size of the discount that I can expect on my water bills to reflect the reduction in the service you are providing. Your company is run for profit just like my local shop. If I go there to buy a large loaf and all they have are small ones I don't get as much bread but I don't have to pay as much. I expect nothing less from a large corporations such as yourselves. Do you see how that works? If you are not going to give me less water I damn well expect to pay less.
What are the Consequences of Failure?
(Brooklyn, NY) A proposed law, (Int 287-A) addresses the Mayor’s Office of Operation’s Scorecard Cleanliness Report, which determines street cleanliness. In March 2010, my office sent a letter to the department requesting to be included in any updates on the scorecard methodology, specifically any streets chosen to be “representative” streets for the purposes of the report.
It's become something of a ritual. Whenever a copy of Asimov's Science Fiction arrives with a story by Tom Purdom in it, I read Tom's story first (unless there's one of my own in the same issue, of course, in which case I read Tom's second). Then, on finishing it, I say aloud, "Why don't more people write science fiction like this?"
Me: Why?
Taking a deep breath, I pick up the phone once more and finally press the button to call Rachel. She answers, and my words flood out.
Instinct MMA‘s second event went down Friday night in Quebec City’s Pavillon de la Jeunesse arena.
I'm looking at Holiday cards to send. I usually choose something that says "peace" or "happy holidays" or something like that because I have a few friends who don't celebrate Christmas. I was even thinking about just doing a Happy New Year card....that way I'm not targeting a religion at all, but still sending a greeting and a photo of Noodle, because I love photos of kids and families for a greeting card. I save them ALL and look at them every year to see how everyone changes.
to the real state of affairs: that we live in the bizarre world of
The stencil of the guy and the word "splat" are both Coffee Break Stencils, as are the dots. I like that the stencils come with both the stencil and the mask, so it makes doing detailed outlining (like the orange around the guy) easier to do. I went back in with my multiliner once I was done airbrushing to give him a little more pop.
Knowledge and selfishness that they gave to us,this is what we use to abuse us
42. Laughed until something u were drinking came out ur nose? - Of course. I laugh a lot, and unfortunately I get what can only be described as a laughing attack. It's actually painful. Something strikes me as uproariously funny and it's like I'm having a seizure. I totally can't breathe (it activates my asthma.) My husband always goes on emergency alert when I'm laughing like that.
Fax: 408-904-5396
Perhaps they are not telling the truth - tax has to be paid by 31st Jan, but the PLR payment doesn't come through until February. But let's assume they are, since we should take people at their word unless we have good reason not to. (Probably all the disasters in my life stem from that naive principle - no matter.)
5) People who think they need to give me "instructions"
Over the tumbled graves, about the chapel
In such an excellent frame of mind, I purchased feed, went home did my chores, and settled into a few games of solitaire as I allowed the morning thoughts to find me. Feeling the changes of the last few weeks popping up in all kind of interesting, wonderful ways, which included a new mental thought “I have a gold mind, I am attractive and I profit from it constantly!”
Another challenge involves the country’s financial regulator, the Central Bank of Tanzania, which regulates the amount that the e-wallet can hold per day. Each SIM card can only send a fixed amount of e-money per day and the transaction cost for loan disbursement is fixed at 1% of the value disbursed to the client. Due to these limitations, Tujijenge is not actively using mobile for disbursement.
And the FAN-TAST-IC prize of 3 Digital Tickled Pink Stamps!! YAY!!
At no point will I comment on the bitterness, hopping rate or condition of any grog I throw down me. I shall not take a pint back nor talk about any of the beer other than “this is okay, not sure about this one” I shall enjoy the company of a friend I haven’t seen for a couple of months and we shall get proper pissed. Proper good style pissed. Because getting pissed is great and getting pissed is what beer is for
Joryn
And as I float, she sings to me
with Elderflowers, marigolds, limeflowers and chamomile to relax your emotional heart'
When the space jockey seeds a planet and then wants to erase the species of life it has created via seeding the planet with genetically engineered DNA if the experiment has gone wrong somehow - IT THEN DROPS THE ALIEN EGGS on to the planet and they kill off the creatures that have been created by the space jockey.
I think Shakespeare was a traveling band of writers, they came up with the name after liking the two words Sheik and the word Spear as in two words but they spelt Sheik wrong and we ended up with it as one word so where it should have read Sheik Spear we have ended up believing it to read Shakespeare.
My 8 miles pace run on Tuesday the 23rd went fantastic, largely thanks to a cool front that brought the temperature down to the low 60’s. After a nice easy mile warm up, I managed my 9 minute per mile pace and even included a couple of walking breaks so most of my splits were in the 8:30 to 8:45 range. It was a really great run, but the next day my calf was in serious pain. This is NOT what you want to feel during training for a major race! I went ahead and ran my 4 miles the next day, talking it very slow with lots of walking breaks and really paying close attention to my form and what made my calf feel better or worse. I was able to establish that pushing off from the ball of my foot was the main culprit so I concentrated on picking my feet straight up and using my glutes and hams for my forward motion. I made it through the run with no additional pain to my Soleus and focused on ice and rest for the next 48 hours.
Anyway, after we dropped the apples a hundred times, they weren't good for anything except HOMEMADE APPLE SAUCE!! Which turned out to be fabulous, and which, of course, Jules hated. Anyway, fun times, fun times.
Darius Latham (2013) – North Central High School (IN) – Latham is better known for his football talents, as he has offers from multiple powerhouse football teams. He brings a toughness to the team that allows him to bang with the best inside and grab boards.
to The French Elements. Can I just say VINTAGE and EXQUISITE.
It is come to my mind that Malaysian political environment needs a lot more improvement, especially with current so called “dual party” system (even not so dual with uncertainties in Pakatan Rakyat). What happen in this dominant system is that the pro government will always support the government and talk bad about the opposition and so do to the opposition side will never accept any efforts made by the government.
I watched them as they washed, dried and spiffed up my camper.
I sometimes find myself eluding the big picture. It takes a moment like this to put me back on track. These moments are uncomfortable and unnerving, but I feel they are necessary for social and personal development - if experienced properly. A supportive colleague and good friend helped me get through my bad moment. Who gives you support? Don’t forget to thank them.
“Hang on, Lucy! I’m coming!” She barely heard herself. Natalie scrambled out from beneath the table and though she gripped the counter, she could hardly stand. How was she even going to reach the stairs, let alone climb them? She felt like she was being shaken to death.
Today was a really intense day in the ICU. Gerry arrived back from the States last night (jet-lagged, the poor thing!), and was back at work full throttle this morning. We were very busy, and my time has run out today... So I am doing a short tutorial on how to make a really easy Heartmade gift, which when you have tried them, will have you making them in bulk like I do... :) really, I promise.
Despite the property’s classic feel, it also has impeccable eco credentials, as it will have its own electricity generation system and solar panels, meaning it will be entirely self-sufficient.
(Three yellow and one blue.)
In order to create immediacy, a writer needs to understand what it means, how immediacy works and how it impacts not just the writing, but also the reader.
...you need to put down the coffee and pick up the want ads. Your lack of sugar buzz is the least of your worries.
then i got to thinking how i loved the white blazer with black pants so i came up with this transition of your basic black & white from business casual to not-so-business glam. this look can also be done at so many price points, always a plus!
I know that in my life balance hasn’t always been something I’ve concentrated on. For instance, I started a job that very early on I decided I wanted to progress in. I outlined my intentions to all the right people, I worked hard, dedicated a lot of time to doing all the right things and asking the right questions. I put all my time and energy into my career.
The reason for this ultrasound was to make sure the placenta was not on/growing into the previous c-section scar. It looked fine in the previous ultrasound so I wasn’t as nervous for that as I was for a repeat of what happened with my last pregnancy. Last time I had an ultrasound in the third trimester they noticed the low fluids and that he was breech. This lead to twice a week non-stress tests and ultimately a C-section at 37 ½ weeks. For the weeks leading up to this ultrasound in the back of my mind I had fears of hearing the same news.
Very curious to see who we get next!
It’s also a really good thing that the preventive services act has expanded to include preventing abnormalities in children and preventing Alzheimer’s and other gross diseases in old people. Just think of all those old folks homes that would be full of elderly if the government hadn’t stepped in to prevent such tragedies.
As for the female panellists: Ruth Jones and Josie Lawrence both appeared in single episodes… Liza Tarbuck and Shappi Khorsandi appeared twice… and Sue Perkins popped up in four episodes! I know it’s wrong to play favourites, but every time I see Tarbuck on this sort of show, I always think that she’d be top of my fantasy dinner party guest list… she isn’t strictly speaking a “comedian”, but she’s so naturally warm and funny, and she has such a fantastic laugh! Khorsandi definitely comes a close second, as far as favourite panellists go though… very sweet and funny and just ridiculously beautiful… sigh…
The lone wolf baying at the moon
Morning Bloggers from an extremely wet Ireland.
3) Put salt in water. Keep stirring until the water is *completely* saturated, accepting no more salt. You can tell this because there will be a layer of non-absorbing salt in the bottom. Also, it should be a pretty vile concoction.
Speaking after Thursday’s meeting, DA police spokeswoman Dianne Kohler Barnard said Mkhwanazi “does not appear to understand the full implications of his revelations”. “He has admitted openly what we have always assumed to be the case – that there is political interference in the SAPS. Remember, the (now defunct) Scorpions investigated too many ANC members and were consequently shut down. (Mkhwanazi) has today confirmed that SAPS members have received instructions not to investigate certain matters,” she added.
This is just a stop on a way where I'm going,
After I left you yesterday I tackled some parts of my to-do list, including going through 143 emails and calling my PR person to talk through some of the things swirling through my brain. After that call, as the rest of the crew headed to the beach, I spent an hour going through my new product website with a fine tooth comb so that the website builder can finalise work and I can sign off and take over managing the site. I then wandered down the 200 bush stairs to the beach to join the family for an hour. I swear it was only five minutes later that we were packing up our stuff and heading back to the apartment for an early lunch. I used that time for a couple more to-dos and to rest a churning stomach.
I don't plan on getting the second volume or any subsequent ones that will undoubtedly be published in the future, but I did splurge on some old BLONDIE paperbacks that seemed to have just what I was looking for as far as giving me an idea of what the thing was like throughout the rest of the thirties. And at least the first two of these reads have a special meaning for me...y'see back when I was eight
Calling up artists, curators, and architects to develop alternative futures and to “consider the ‘invisible’ space of electronic data flow as a substance that needs a structure, a politics, and a poetics”, his “Poetics of Augmented Space” laid the ground for an ethics of living in today’s Augmented City.
I forgive myself that I have accepted and allowed myself to trust my experience I have towards sex and relationship.
love you as my sweet
The Ruins of Noe picks up several months after the first book ends. Brigitta has just started her apprenticeship with the Elders when a child is born with no destiny: one of many signs that the White Forest faeries have lost touch with the Ethereals, the Ancient Ones. Without their protection, the forest will lose its balance and fall prey to the outside world.
1112 D-V/3(A)/1991. “June Fulkerson (1926-1990).” Dedication, Lecture, Southern Illinois University, Carbondale, Illinois. See Item D-V/27/1978, above. See, also, Item B-10, above, p. 294, n. 2221113 ***D-V/3(B)/1991. Southern Illinois’s Abraham Lincoln.” Greek-American Community Services of Chicago and the Illinois Endowment for the Humanities. Southern Illinois University, Carbondale, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item B-10, above, pp. 123-34, 294-96 (1999).)
Their remaining there demanded a yieldedness to the authority of the command. They all knew that He was the Lord and they called Him Lord. They were finally prepared to obey His commands. It took many events to bring them to this point but from now on they were prepared to follow Him all he way.
But as soon as I start to feel anything approaching frustration any emotions I feel seem to die off.
From a country headed into a cyclonic funnel of fiscal torment?
He blamed a governance structure that scants the role of elected officials. “Bad governance has yielded unsatisfactory results,” he said. Also, as he’s expressed before, he said subsidies distort any view of such projects, since we can no longer tell what the market can produce. “Public investment should be made when it’s essential and necessary, not when it is merely a way to enrich developers,” he said, adding that he wasn’t casting aspersions on any specific project.
“Oh, that was just a dream…..,” said the mother to the child. “You were asleep the whole time.”
In my office,otherwise known as the sitting room in the cottage,I have a large black leather couch and two reclining chairs.I have had them for a long time and they have become saggy and one of the recliners is broken,the couch has always been uncomfortable and we were thinking of replacing them.
Margaret Noble — The Object of Power Is Power
Am I a good poet? I like to think so. Others no doubt disagree.
- Lavender candles, well lavender anything really
I've already covered hot guys (and plenty of them), and TimeLord1 has taken care of narwhals, so I'm now going to cover tea.
"Why can't they be 6 again? Whhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhy?????"
Well I have grown up responsibilities (Job, Car, School, Etc) but i will always be a kid, i spend most of my time now the way i spent my childhood, hours and hours of games
"I'm furious," she said.
Rhododendron x ‘Hino-white Dwarf” (Kurume Hybrid) – A truly spectacular evergreen azalea with innumerable pure white ruffled blooms that cover the entire plant contour from April to May. This cultivar is much denser than ‘Hino-white’ and can be easily sheared (after blooming) into an informal flowering hedge. Grows 2 to 2.5 feet tall and wide. Zone 6.
This is what happens when you perform well in a game for me! You get a one way ticket to the painting table! Let that be a lesson to you warcasters…
Be sure to include CHBB and the author's name in the subject line
Thank you Wasafiri.
The BNP percentage was 14.9.
Oranges! are very sweet like
We were left alone to relax and wait for the contractions to intensify. Kara estimated that Jack would probably be born the next afternoon. Jake and I talked and he eventually drifted off to sleep. Me- not so much. I was still having the surges that began almost 24 hours previously so every time I’d get close to falling asleep, I’d feel that intense surge that started in my lower back and washed through my body like a
Last Friday the weather got a little bit warmer and then it started to rain and so the thick layer of snow that we'd been living with for the previous 10 days gradually, gradually disappeared.
During high school, I was the mood maker. I think I mainly danced a lot to Rain senior and SHINee seniors’ dances. I thought I was doing my best dancing, but my friends thought it was really funny to see. (Kai: He showed it to us when we were trainees too, it’s really awesome. He must’ve been very popular. I wonder what he would’ve done if he didn’t become an idol? / Suho: I thought he was doing a live performance.)
Verily, those who give the Bai’a (pledge) to you (O Muhammad), they are (in fact) giving the Bai’a (pledge) to Allah. (V.48: 10).
Yes, I am finally back.......
about our date. She waited in the door. She had curled her hair and was
- How can you replace the anger you feel with happiness?
That smother the television screen
Zinn's report supports previous findings that most attacks occur between 7pm and midnight, while people are relaxed - cooking or watching TV - and their security systems are not activated.
No surprise here, as the week goes on, I'm getting lazy. Less pictures and I didn't write anything down today. I'm just having too much fun with my mom here. But I did get a few really cute pictures of my mom with the kids and I'm so glad I did!
The Illusionist (Animated Film) – Dec 25
Console reviews
And clearly, from the above pic, it's safe to assume that this is something I'm still trying to achieve.
…is in love with Daddy’s big red truck.
Jesus, this blog did not go where I had intended it to expand. But it felt good to release. It is a means to an end that was necessary for my troubled thoughts. Merrp. Oh, and I am reading 50 Shades of Grey which is extremely provocative and is seriously inspiring some sexy poetry soon. Ciao ciao.
Transfer the shrimp mixture onto a small baking sheet. Divide the mixture into 4 portions, and loosely pack each into a 1-inch thick burger. You want to be gentle here - don't try to pick up the mixture and shape it the way you might with a traditional burger. Cover the burgers with plastic wrap and refrigerate for at least 30 minutes (or up to 24 hours).
Hi blog buddies...
I've met someone else.
Toss with the pasta to combine. Add salt and pepper to taste.
I am so excited for this release! Kanjani8 said that the eito rangers would come back during their 8th year anniversary, but I never expected a movie! I expected just another eito ranger skit when they toured this year. Kanjani8 always manages to blow me away and top everything they have done before. Eighters have been wanting the eito rangers to come back since the last time they were seen in the Puzzle tour (though they were briefly seen during the 2009-2010 countdown when they did Arashi’s “One Love”). They came back 2 years later during this past year’s 2011-2012 countdown and that is when it was promised that the eito rangers would be back this year. Everyone was excited and this movie is what we get from it! I can say that I am proud to be an eighter and that Kanjani8 listens to the fans and manages to top what even the fans want somehow. Good Luck Kanjani8!
Erasing your traces without knowing.
And now they don't exist anymore.
What does she find relaxing? "Space!" Space? As in… "Space! I went to the Royal Observatory the other day, and looked through the biggest telescope in the UK. I saw a star from 47 years in the past. Hang on…" She leaps up to find her phone and shows me her screensaver, a photo of Saturn.
After letting the two layers set in the fridge for about half an hour, I proceeded to make and fill my top layer of bittersweet chocolate mousse. Then I let the whole cake set in the fridge for the rest of the afternoon, and then decorated the top with more halved strawberries. And I left the leaves on to add a splash of green to the cake.
H/t Olaf K.
Mrs. Floro’s back, her hair and the entire blackboard were at once covered in white chalk; and with that many hitting the solid surfaces at one time the room was filled with a soft white fog.
Who else has lovely weekend plans and how do you manage time to yourselves if you have children?
Are relationship books full of bunk or is there some merit to them?
Looking forward to reading about your Origins!
Passing along a narrow hallway, Brown finally came to a small rectangular room with a pyramid-shaped ceiling. He was totally amazed that this room contained no algae or coral growing on the inner walls. They were completely spotless!
Washington has a rich geological history making it one of the best sites for rockhounding. This article provides a quick background of why Washington State has such wonderful minerals.
Which is all bullshit.
“That’s why I am proud of our tens of thousands of new members; of opening up our party to our registered supporters who may not be members of the party but support it and I am proud to lead a party affiliated to three million working people through our link to the trade unions: the nurses who look after the sick, the teaching assistants who teach our children and the shop workers, the engineers, the bus drivers.
Giorgio Vigna
SAPA also puts on events to get to the root of some of the issues surrounding sexual assault. On April 17 SAPA put on an event called “That Sl*t Asked for it, Right?” which called attention to victim blaming. According to Kendall Samuels, a SAPA, “it also deals with the language of our society and how we interact with survivors and how we view them.”
Countries in Africa and Asia where babies are routinely living for a few days or hours or being born dead because of the poverty are not as ‘sexy’ as Japan was for a few weeks because the TV pictures were not there on TV screens.
Hear me VA – if you are not fully engaged into an audio/visual program for children’s ministry, you are missing an enormous opportunity for growth! I believe this is our time, God is moving, momentum is growing and Virginia is in the midst of new and unprecedented revival across the state!
“With some Commonwealth countries, including India and Pakistan resisting a draft UN Action Plan on safety of journalists, the CJA warned that democracy itself is under threat due to constraints on the ability of journalists to operate,” she added.
I Will Alway’s Love you
(And yes, this demonstrates why commas are sometimes very necessary. But next time we're hungry, we'll be sure to consult her recipe for cooking family members. Some of our nieces and nephews look delicious.)
Me: "Not even close."
"I will take the Ring...though I do not know the way." (Frodo Baggins, The Fellowship of the Ring)
A few minutes later the music came back on. I inhaled.
I was asked - amazingly - to join another group of bloggers: The History Girls. These are such smart ladies that most of my historical thoughts quiver with fear whenever I try to grab them, but - aha! - I have brought in a cunning link to help with my HG post this Saturday. But even on HG there's such an astounding array of posts that I wallow there instead of fretting about over here in my Diary.
They are city foxes and probably come from nearby allotments. When I first saw them, I was quite surprised as they are quite tame and one once tried to come into my house.
With all I put in I’m bound to blow up…firework.
Stretch your neck to look a bit farther down Lenox, you’ll access another, earlier lesson in Malcolm X’s history. It’s Malcolm’s old hangout! The Paradise Bar at Lenox Lounge, 288 Lenox Avenue, between 124th and 125th. http://www.lenoxlounge.com/history.html Packed with memories of Malcolm, it’s where “he hangs out and begins running numbers” prior to his arrest and imprisonment. http://www.movie-locations.com/movies/m/malcolmx.html
He is El Shadai, God Almighty. “He who dwells in the secret place of the Most High Shall abide under the shadow of the Almighty” (Psalm 91:1). Joseph knew that he dwelt under the shadow of a vey mighty God. How could he be afraid when the very same God that spoke the whole universe into existence with his mightiness, is the one who took care of him?
PAUL: Well, I don’t think we should go to the moon. I think we maybe should send some politicians up there.
I have to remember that more often. Take a break, and come back with a clearer mind.
The last meeting in San Luis Obispo between Cal Poly and UCSB set attendance records, and most remember the historic ending. After a goal in the finals minutes of the game, Center Back Pat Sigler hit a game-winning PK that sent a roar throughout the city.
Or, to look at the positive side of it… What a tremendous gift to save all of oneself for that special person – not just “what hasn’t been touched” physically, but also the thoughts, ideas and dreams that have never been shared except with that person. I would be tremendously honored if someone saved even those for just me! And that’s what I want for my kids! But for them to be able to offer that to someone, it means waiting – even to “date” – until they know that this is the person for whom God created them.
Whatever it was, I liked it… and as we stepped into the lobby filled with power women simultaneously setting their phones to “silent”, I immediately felt the stress of the city slipping away, and was taken to a place of pure zen – one that smelled like leather, Teddy Roosevelt, and wistfulness (Nick Miller- you put it better than I ever could).
This is what I am planning this year but I may change my mind depending on what you share. I can't wait to see your gift ideas!
I am still working out all the details on this, and you will find a link on my sidebar once I have it all up and running. My plan is to have a calendar to track the birthdays. I have set up a special email for this project alone.
Walking through the various areas of the church, I was encouraged by the way people were loving one another. Before the worship service, two men prayed for me. And during the service, I felt free and strong. Delivering my sermon felt...well, it just felt right.
when will women in US start chaining themselves to railings/ burning bras? Or are we less feminist than sisters of old?
Of 150 registered titles, half the PLR comes from the top four titles - they are all children's fiction. Of the top 10 titles, 9 are fiction. More of my titles are non-fiction than fiction, so that's a very significant result. The non-fiction title in the top ten is a glossy, very visual book on volcanoes published by Dorling Kindersley. Of the 9 fiction, all except one are published by a very large publisher, and all published since 2007. The books with titles most likely to appeal to children (in my view) did not score higher than those with less intriguing titles. (The official info that has been released so far shows loans of children's fiction up slightly, loans of adult books slightly down.)
This past week however was tainted with a streak of misfortune. I missed out on the PERFECT dresser for the baby at an estate sale. We spent Saturday morning roaming the Augusta area looking for a good quality dresser for baby G. After many "legal U-turns" per the GPS we arrived at our last rummage for the day. But alas, the white brand new Bassett dresser was already sold. This spurred me on to create a yard sale map for this coming Saturday. I've been tracking listed yard sales in an effort to effectively target those close by home and that might hold that diamond in the rough I'm looking for.
Hope everyone had a great weekend! Niko slept for 6.5 hours straight last night! Not a peep out of him. This might not sound like a big deal to you, but for me, HUGE. We are hoping this trend continues so that we can be humans again and sleep for more than 2.5 hours at a time. Yay for small victories!
I was able to get these beautiful tomatoes this morning. See that bag behind them on the left? That is the best salt. It's not normal table salt but it's a sea salt that the Mennonites in this area sell. Love that stuff.
=adding an extra workout to the current schedule
So as writers this is a doubly exciting time. It’s where we get to meet our public and to embrace the wonderful people who don’t yet know us and swaddle them in our fabulousness. Aren’t you bursting with anticipation?
And another trivial thing that I'm totally thrilled about is that my mom gave me some Aveda Foot Relief cuz my feet were all dry and cracked and sore. Let me tell you that stuff is like golden lotiony goodness. If I could I'd bathe in it. My feet are so smooth and exfoliated now. All I have left to do is paint my toenails and my feet will be all pretty. I wish I could find my toe rings.
Take away: Talk to the audience before you start; this is the best way to assuage nerves if you’re uncomfortable. Ask questions. Maybe do a poll on favorite genre, how they know you, favorite character (particularly if you have an Edward/Jacob setting), or maybe how far they drove to come. The people coming to a book signing want to feel known even if it’s only a small way.
Have you seen the stuff of the Earth?How dense are you?
internet 24×7 to make sure your applications get the updates and email are refreshed, thus making not use for a laptop.
I left out the Cognac since I didn't have any and I skipped the blanching step with the garlic. Instead I just peeled the cloves by slightly smashing them. Next time I'd probably just buy a jar of peeled cloves from the store to make it easy.
While riding any train, you have to do what the conductor says. Stop when he wants to stop, go when he wants to go. You might get new conductors every year, and sometimes multiple conductors will rotate through each day. Some of them will be amazing people, who will inspire you. Others will be mean, make you feel stupid. They all have different expectations of how the ride is supposed to go. You are expected to know this, and adapt to each one. To know what each one requires of you and be able to give it, even on your worst days. If you don't follow the rules on the train, they might kick you off. You might be relieved that you are getting off, until you realize they are only taking you to another train.
Perhaps this is an additional reflection we can bring to verses 17 and 18 — that we make the most of each day by loving and helping each other fully in this world.
First, Yahoo sucks. At least, my version of Yahoo email does. It's corrupted somehow so that I can only receive messages but cannot reply, forward, or file them. I can occasionally send an email but it requires several extra steps on my part. And it pisses me off because I can't seem to find a human at Yahoo to talk to about this.
Manhattan’s century-old flower district occupies little more than a block of West 28th Street, between Avenue of the Americas and Seventh Avenue, and is shrinking like a puddle in the sun. Delightfully lush, it is a verdant riot of color and fragrance. Go early, or pay retail and bring your business card.
his hat ran down his back. When even his
The purpose: To get back in the habit of blogging regularly by following a weekly format for the month of May. (Or if you already post regularly, to have an easy schedule to follow without having to struggle with what to blog about.) (But if posting every day sounds like too much, or if you miss a few days, or only do a couple posts a week, who cares, yanno?)
And if there happens to be a butterfly?
The IGP. Inc. manufacturing team in Menlo Park, CA
4. Then scores (out of five) are allocated for Bitter and Sweet depending upon the bitterness units, present gravity and most importantly what it tastes like.
The Newark Star-Ledger quotes anonymous sources who say that, were the New Jersey Nets to sign a long-term (not temporary) deal to play at Newark's Prudential Center, the New Jersey Sports and Exposition Authority would waive the clause imposing a $12 million penalty (which declines somewhat beginning in 2009) if the team moves to a venue other than in Brooklyn or Queens.
There are, on average, 10 candidates for each cloud computing job in the U.S., according to WANTED Analytics.
The price of a hard cover book is about the same as a soft cover (only about $2 more) because we manufacturer our own patented book covers.
A form of 'discreet', this to me states prudence. An ability to keep one's mouth shut. To know when to hold information from whom and whom to give it to when the time is right.
Here you will find an outline of the trainings and events and also links to blogs, bibliography and more. If you are in the Cape Town area (South Africa) and you would like to become an initiate of The Temple of Mary, please read the articles on this blog, The Book of Mary and especially the Messages received from Mary as these form the foundation of the teachings.
It was a relaxed Sunday afternoon tea in the beautiful Priory with an interesting and diverse audience of women ranging from 17 – 80 and (and one very charming gentleman). My session was called ‘Being Different: A Challenge or an Opportunity?’ and during it I spoke candidly about my experiences of living with my disability, the lessons learned and much more random stuff besides. I’m still a little nervous before speaking at events, and always hoping that a) people will turn up and b) that I don’t send anyone off to sleep!
Hold it right there. I know that un-PC speakers and writers who have been silenced and menaced are fighting for freedom of speech. But a society that wants to survive does not practice freedom of speech. Are there debates about the divinity of Jesus at universities in Saudi Arabia? Or about the merits of the British colonization of Hong Kong at universities in PR China? In the one, they want to remain Muslim; in the other, materialist-Confucian Chinese. Which should be fine with us. That we hold debates about Islam — a profoundly alien, lethally hostile ideology — and the integration of its practitioners in Western society, is a symptom of dementia that I would diagnose as compulsive cognitive Onanism. A nation that admits all ideas for endless debate believes in no ideas, and has no will to live.
Did he have the inevitable cigarette dangling from his pouting lips? I can’t remember that detail from publications that were all the rage forty five to fifty years ago.
Speaking of field trips today I went with Pi on a filed trip to the Renaissance Fair. Lots of fun was had by all.
in the episode "Os" Walter has been trying to figure out how his former lab partner, the multi-billionaire genius William Bell, founder of Massive Dynamic, would have healed the interdimensional chaos that Walter started when he opened the door to the other universe and kidnapped the other Peter Bishop as a boy in order to save him from an unspecified genetic illness. When William Bell died, he left Nina Sharpe, his true love and the director of Massive Dynamic, one significant gift as a memento. A bell.
It’s been occupying my head for the past three weeks. It wants to be written. This is simply one of those cases where I have distanced myself from it for a bit because I think, deep down, I believe it has the potential to be the best writing I have ever done…and it’s not horror. And that terrifies me.
Interested in the final results?
Glaucoma is not picky. It can afflict a person regardless of age, health, or race. Glaucoma can occur at any age, but the most commonly affected are the older individuals.
9/19: Minneapolis, MN @ Triple Rock Social Club *
Nothing is ever what you expect it to be. Delhi mostly feels like a twilight zone. Here I am wearing a kurta and salwar on the gender dived metro train and girls wearing dresses above the knee are staring at me, while I’m staring back. I decided I would go to Good Earth Cafe for lunch to enjoy a caprese salad, before I had to go do an interview. I was by myself and preparing for my interview. Two Indian ladies sat at the next table. The whole conversation was in English and they were talking about one of my favorite guilty pleasures–Gossip Girl. I now know Blaire is with Dan. I turned around when I heard this news and was shocked. Here I am in the country’s capital enjoying a slightly over priced salad at a posh cafe and I hear what happens in the latest episodes of Gossip Girl. Recently, I have completely checked out. I went to Dunkin’ Donuts this week. I’m adding things to my wishlist from Urban Outfitters. I’m dreaming of my first meal when I get back. I have trouble falling asleep because I am planning what I will do when I get back to Portland. Reality… where are you?
Arranged and Conducted by Arthur Greenslade
Throw in the remainder of Davids interactions with Snake and the amazing entrance, and you the television viewers simply missed out.
My assistant had never heard of the Kindle until she started working here and saw the one Kim purchased. Obviously she loves books and is an avid reader.
G and I enjoyed a taste from several of the trucks:
Ok, so i haven’t posted in a LOOOOOOOOONG time, but that is because I am lazy But my cooking skills have improved drastically over the past few months, and now I cook up a storm at least 3 times a week! This past week I started the Paleo Diet which you can read about at http://www.robbwolf.com/ It’s pretty awesome! Anyway, I had to convince my test subject to do this diet with me and lose some of those LBs he’s packed on over the winter. So, I went to the store, got seriously Gluten-free and went to make him a dinner that would keep him full, and not make him fat!
Leather wins over polyester shell
This article depressed old Herm out! Old Herm likes his cognac after work
Good with meatballs, too
Second, science and modern philosophy are both descended from a single discipline – ancient philosophy. The split likely happened for the same reason any other discipline has ever split: the body of knowledge becomes large enough and range of research questions clustered enough. Science was interested in questions of what existed empirically, and philosophy was interested in how thinking worked. One discipline turned inward; the other turned outward. Yin and yang; only the two together can yield a truly complete understanding of the universe.
The scout nodded as he returned the gaze.
About half way into it, I sought the assistance of a number of professionals to help me learn how to deal with the psychological challenges of anxiety and depression that were crippling my life generally and making progress virtually impossible. It was incredibly difficult to do, but learning to ask for help was the best move I made. Indeed it was when I sought help that I really started to take responsibility for my experience, for my life – that I started to grow and that I really started to make serious progress in my work and much more besides.
Come to think of it (and you may think I’m a bit strange for this) but I do like being out in the rain sometimes. When the rain is hammering down, but it’s still warm, and you’ve got nowhere specific to be, then it’s quite nice to be out… ‘Cleansing’, perhaps? Certainly easier to let your mind wander.
There are primarily two areas where Westerners/Americans stay while in Guangzhou. Historically, it has been Shamian Island. The island has many beautiful French Colonial buildings that were built by the French and British in the 1800's. It has quiet park like streets and seems to be of a different world than the rest of Guangzhou. It is here, where the famous White Swan hotel is. The hotel where in the early years of the Chinese adoption process, everyone stayed. It is very luxurious and the most expensive hotel to stay at while waiting out the adoption process. If the rooms had been larger, we probably would have stayed there, just for the historical aspect of it. But with three kids, we really needed a larger room (and better economics).
I know I promised the new Candy Skein colorway, and don't worry, I will deliver Thursday! Be sure to check it out!
And then came Macie. She is just the best, most good-natured baby. I had a great weekend with her. We had fun and Easter was great.
This will give you an idea of how gun control laws worked. Following the firebombing of his house in 1956, Dr. Martin Luther King, who was, among other things, a Christian minister, applied for a gun permit, but the Alabama authorities found him unsuitable. A decade later, he won a Nobel Peace Prize.
by Jared Mort of Oldfields Liquor Room and Cooper Gillespie of
Lisa liked collecting bottles with deposits on them as she could top up her pocket money that way. She knew that the deposit was different for different types of bottle. With a bit of luck she might at least find one bottle now, maybe even two. But today was seemingly not her lucky day.
And now, for today's creation:
Founders Breakfast Stout
Songhay Empire
I’ll let you know what happens. To be honest, you couldn’t stop me. There’s that small matter of having to fill thirty blog posts during the next thirty days . . .
“I don’t want to achieve immortality through my work. I want to achieve it through not dying.”
Come have a listen to the Joe and Parrish as they took some time from their busy schedule to talk to us about opening a new space (in what seems like record time), their thoughts on design and of course, how they got into the business.
This image of the woman with the monkey was taken by Jacek Palkiewicz from the 2007 Huaorani Expedition and can be found here
He rang back soon afterwards to say he was withdrawing his complaint against the wombat, a court was told Wednesday.
Easter Fish or Poisson d’Avril
3 tsp of dill seed.
What we need to keep in mind is that striking down the law in toto won't create a vacuum, it will return us to the pre-obamacare system. A system that was cheaper, and covered more people, by the way. This doesn't mean republicans shouldn't have a game plan ready, though, because while ObamaCare made things worse, they weren't that great to begin with. It should be obvious that among the solutions republicans need to offer is a continuation of the two most popular "goodies" - abolition of pre-existing conditions and an option for parents to keep their 26 year-old adult children on their insurance. The costs for these perks will be passed on to the consumers who opt for them, of course - but then, you're only fooling yourself if you thought they weren't going to under ObamaCare.
In a healthy athletics office the coaching staffs are generally supportive of each other. It’s good for the program and it’s good for the University. You see it at Kentucky all the time. Both in person and on the internet, Kentucky coaches can be seen and heard promoting, supporting and cheering for other teams throughout the athletics department.
SU Ink Regal Rose
Ah, technology!
Maybe that’s why I have a bigger drive for traditional publication over self-publishing. I get a much bigger high seeing the physical copy of my labor.
Phil has looked right fed up all week, it’s one thing being at work and missing the children during the day, it is another when you can’t put them to bed because they aren’t here or not bathing them because they aren’t there, no “nick jnr” TV or “playhouse Disney” TV channels on, no strange American children sitcoms being watched by Dec, no tantrums and noise and “I wants, I wants”. It is truly really quiet, TOO quiet!!!
Apart from asam laksa and char kway teow, Hokkien prawn noodles or simply known as hokkien mee in Penang is a must try dish for tourists visiting the island. This culinary treasure brought to Malaysia by Hokkien migrants a century ago can now be found all over Malaysia.
During the past 50 years over a million people have visited this remarkable man in Brazil. As a result of his extraordinary gift, many have received healing for illnesses believed to be incurable. Featuring leading doctors of medicine and scientists, as well as testimonials from people who have been healed, this film provides an insight into their physical and emotional journeys which go beyond conventional medical knowledge.
from the extremely talented Cooper Carras.
Jeanne xxx
BMW will bring the globally successful (275,000 units sold so far) X1 to the US in the fall of 2012. Unlike other BMW SAVs, X1s destined for the US will be built in BMW’s Leipzig, Germany plant. The popularity of the X1 around the globe has been such that X1s for the Chinese market will now be built in a newly opened plant at Tiexi in Shenyang Province.
It's so much fun to cut and fold and paste.
2) Choose to do this at least 30 days in a row and take a little break. Notice that my break did not consist of not writing at all. And it wasn’t that long relative to the 30 day time period. If you mess up 17 days in or 6 days in or however much, start your 30 days over.
from left to right: grey shrunken peacoat, suede jacket that looks like it belongs in a bookies, green parka, red old navy jacket, secondhand beige gap coat fit for a flasher, secondhand navy topshop trench, velvet collared capeish coat, and beigey trench
She was convincing though, and finally talked me into throwing myself at the mercy of Zappos' customer service department. I sent them a link to the fall-down blog, and begged them to read it.
he formed a habit of dropping in evenings to drink,
Well, maybe this is for the best. After all, she’s going to have to love you for who you are, if she’s going to love you at all. Best of luck, Frank!
Sean
It has been a long time since I wrote anything. If you are still reading, thanks for hanging in there! Life just hit that level of busy where blogging fell off the priority list. I last posted just before the kids birthdays in February. I found myself blocked while trying to write the annual 'there goes another year ' update. Much as I love when others write endearingly of their growing children, and much as I adore my kids, I found myself unable to come out with any sincere or satisfying happy birthday posts. The fact that they turned 6 and 4 within a few days of each other and that the intervening time was filled with a business trip to Japan and China, that their fairly elaborate party was two days before I left, and that I had to generate 60 home made valentine cards for them to take to school/preschool before leaving for the trip made the week too overwhelming to write about. The fact that we survived it, and that everyone had a wonderful time has to go down in old fashioned memory, and a couple of facebook status updates, rather than in insightful prose.
If you're buying low cost items, vendors may grumble at breaking your 20 dollar bill. I try and have singles when possible to avoid this... but it's not a requirement.
4月21日(木)の夜６時から８時まで。
Pulled from the “This seems oddly similar” series here at CultFit HQ
What if you were able to see what customers were saying about your business, but you had a chance to respond and open a dialogue with them? This is what social media means to business. Social media marketing is a great opportunity for businesses to open a two-way conversation with customers to determine their likes, dislikes, wants and needs. If you wanted this information in the past, you would have had to pay a marketing firm a pretty penny to research that information.
Simply excellent wave here...freshly ripped at 320kbps.
Holier-than-thou agenda aside, the naked assault on logic and critical thinking on display here is enough to describe this ad's own private circle in Hell. If advertisements had a Hell, which I guess would imply that advertisements had a soul. But would that apply to print as well as television? What about the little stickers on race cars? Would they be the unbaptized babes of the advertising afterlife? Would coupons be the Jews? You know... snip-snip?
The iPad 2 might troop on for up to 10 hours, but you’ll be hard pressed to squeeze as much as 5 out of the PS Vita. And that’s with screen brightness turned right down and wi-fi turned off etc.
The Split itself
3. Praline Feuillete (Crisp) Insert
But the ante is considerably upped in my opinion when you start tossing out the “t” word. Unless you want to start calling these guys thugs, too.
Dear Preferential Husband,
Somewhat ironically last year in the run up to London Marathon I spent most of my weekends running in the most gruesome weather getting blisters on my feet and subsequently a dodgy knee before marathon day descended upon us with the hottest day of the year so far and a horrible race with a finish time of 5:41:15 which really left me demoralised and unmotivated. Shift forwards 12 months, and after nigh-on perfect training conditions in which I ended up running about 95% in clement conditions race day turned out to be one of the single worst days of the year – howling winds, rain, and at times hail.
Which takes me back to the kind comments that people have been sending 'me'. It’s right and good that people look out for other people. What troubles me is that their praise is predicated upon motives that have much to do with my supposed celebrity and not the efforts I’ve put into Twitter. If I didn’t have this name, would they think me funny? I guess not. And, from my side of the equation, it’s hard to feel any sense of accomplishment when you know people are judging you by a show you may have done in 1993 but you really can’t recall. The same, to a lesser extent, is true of this blog. I’m not so big a fool as to think that much of the attention it has received hasn’t had to do with the Madeley brand.
Dialogue: 6,0:17:31.47,0:17:35.23,Default,,0000,0000,0000,,Then allow me to tell you the story of the secret club.
After dancing, we were STARVING, and we all went to lunch at Chipotle. It was DELICIOUS! I absolutely loved it. I'd never eaten there before. I got the burrito with some kind of meat. Beef, and a sauce of sorts. With pintos and cheese and sour cream and cheese and mild salsa and OMGosh it was divine! I'm going back, and bringing CPT with me!!!
In a small saucepan, melt the margarine. Once melted, add the non-dairy milk and heat until lukewarm. Remove from heat and set aside. In a large bowl, mix the yeast and 2 Tbsp of sugar together. Add the milk mixture and stir until combined. Let sit for 5 minutes.
A Tale of Two Liberals
People are living on dead end street.
Thank you all to my blog family for listening and coming along on this insane ride we call life!
Dirty Silverware (dir. Steve Daniels) - I've got a few pieces of mismatched silverware - an odd faux-wood-handled soup spoon, a fork with a plastic stem, etc. - and Dirty Silverware tells us where these pieces of unfortunate utensils come from. Not only are they "dirty," they're also capable of great evil, and this short tells the story of one man who loses more than most would dare to sacrifice to stop this table setting madness.
Description: Crews are constructing a four-lane divided highway between Marshfield and Stevens Point. Crews will construct and prepare this section of the new alignment for concrete paving.
Jay Hogart
In addition to a listing of accommodations, restaurants, and museums, it contained a small phrasebook. What follows is the collection of French phrases that Let’s Go has deemed most useful for visitors. The list is unedited and presented in order. I considered including a running commentary regarding the utility of each phrase, but I decided against it. I think you will agree that there is so much to say, and yet sometimes no commentary is best.
The recent weeks saw some positive rowing in the leading up to the NSW state champs, this week though was about re-establishing ourselves with some volume while testing our limits with threshold work. The time apart from the four is so we get time home with families.
That's the "shrinking:" The city's populated footprint, the area that street crews, utility crews and police officers and firefighters must service, would shrink. Flint would save money, and the land would be open and ready for whatever development the future would bring.
wools, velvet, flour cloth...perfectly patched & primitive!
My foster-brother attended a foster support group every week, where other kids in foster situations would meet up, and hash out their issues. Somehow one of the agents for a New York based talk show got in contact with the leader of this group, and wanted to use one of the “troubled teens” and their family on his show. The leader helped him get in contact with a foster kid, and her family, who agreed to do the show. At the last minute the family decided not to do it, and the agent still had a spot to fill. For one reason or another my brother was the one they decided would be perfect, and the next day we were flown off to New York, and picked up in a stretch limo.
The customer attempting to pay his mortgage, firefighter Robert Somerton, recorded the ordeal in Lakeport branch which made the bank manager so upset that he called the police. The police detained Somerton for a half hour before releasing him with a warning that he may never return to that BoA branch or he’ll be arrested.
2 resulting
Finishing:
Built myself
with a spoon for deep feeding,
I liked the President’s statement that “…the winner of the science fair needs to be celebrated,” although I find it odd that he compared such recognition to Super Bowl winners. I’ve long thought those who excel in academics deserve the same recognition as those who excel in sports. But I doubt you’re going to change an entire society’s attitude. I mean, will local newspapers devote a whole section to academic achievers like they do to athletes? I wish they did, but it’s not going to happen.
I can tell you're positively agog to know why. I bet right now you're asking yourself "Uh oh! What's she done now?"
The waves explode.
This article, compared to the last, is a little less flowery and a lot more detail.
A $125 Logo from Boutique by Design
Emma is offering a £10 voucher to her store.
SH: That's something that wouldn't happen if I were the stay at home spouse.
Various ‘old school’ projects have recently been touted on Kickstarter (and similar fund-raising sites). Rather than question the merit of certain of these projects, your humble host chooses to endorse enthusiastically Champions of ZED.
If people in the audience pay attention even for a few minutes, they'll ride an emotional coaster of exhilaration and exhaustion, fear and courage, sorrow and happiness. All you have to do is listen to feel the full spectrum of the human condition, and I'm not exaggerating here. Think of the words that represent emotions—beleaguered, rejected, disillusioned, empty, hostile, jubilant, hopeful, quenched, soothed, happy,—at some point this evening, everyone in that concert hall will feel these things.
I agree. . . but. . .
I'm hoping the shot will open me up so I can breathe again.
We are made from our moms and dads.
Residents of Hammamet were gathered at the mansion of a relative of the president, Zine al Abidine Ben Ali. Throughout his presidency, Ben Ali had filtered money and privilege into the hands of his small circle of relatives and friends. This made the extravagant living quarters of this small group of people very visible targets for Tunisian anger.
If you’ve read “Notes From A Dragon Mom” (and if you haven’t, please do, I can wait. No really, go ahead I’ll be here. Done? Okay, moving on), the author talks about her son with Tay-Sachs (also called GM2 Gangliosidosis, very close cousin to Armand’s GM1), and how she and her husband parent for today, knowing that it’s all they have — they don’t have the concerns for college or weddings or sports teams. They take the joys they can in day-to-day living, having gained some acceptance of the inevitable. I mention this because the two main things in the previous paragraph (Armand’s disposition despite troubles and his new sitting style) are major deals to me, something that most parents of a 3-year-old would never worry or think about. It shows that he’s fighting, he’s progressing where he can, he’s more or less adapting the best he can.
Force down a good burger and chips with this one..... it matches very well!
Having known nuclear devastation up close, first during wartime in 1945, and then in peacetime last year upon seeing the writing on the tsunami wall, Japan has acted with alacrity, From the same AP report,
Our next item is from Cool Kids Crochet, they are donating two adorable crochet newborn hats. One is a baby blue jay hat and one's a baby cardinal, how cute is this?
The question: are these enterprise clients really the future of mobile social in the workplace? Or are today’s consumer services now too popular and too pervasive to be supplanted? As we have seen with the Bring Your Own Device revolution, workers do not like having tools they do not like shoved down their throats. To succeed, enterprise clients will have to be as powerful and comfortable as the best consumer services.
So beautiful and serene,
Physical Activity
Iron Stylus: Ahem, excuse me.
Part 2
I'm so happy hubs has the weekend off
Happily married to an extraordinary Choctaw woman, Leticia Marie, since December, 2008.
I didn't pay attention to the length when I bought them... oops.
18. Create
My iphone has arrived! Yup, after a long delay due to high demand, one of my most longed-for Christmas gifts showed up at my house yesterday afternoon. It was a cinch to set up, beautifully designed in every way, and I am now hooked.
I found it hard to adapt to the level of rudeness New Yorkers show towards you in the city. It draws apart at times. And I have a problem with the racism that still separates blacks and whites and will probably not be resolved in the near future. I am also repulsed at times at the social gap in between city parts and how uncaring people trample upon each other.
and yet feel so weak
Years later, when I found myself developing the idea of the Archonate universe, I thought it would be interesting to explore the culture at the time when the change was about to happen again, although virtually nobody knew it. So, in every subsequent tale, including the Imbry stories, the impending cataclysm is the background to the foreground events. It’s a bit like the first half of 1914, when there is a great, highly articulated civilization that does not know—although a few suspect—that it’s about to come to an abrupt and tragic end. “The lamps are going out all over . . . we will not see them lit again in our lifetime.” That kind of thing.
DON’T TRUST THE B is, for my money, the best of the B-driven shows. Could go either way. If you like it, watch it, DVR it, and watch it another fifty times.
He still wears a size 6 shoe.
Hubby also sat in this waiting room, so he was also able to watch my whole procedure! From walking in the room to walking out, it took about 10 minutes. The actual laser part took about 15 seconds in each eye.
The other key elected official to speak was Assemblyman Hakeem Jeffries (right), who’s taken a cautiously supportive (but sometimes shifting) stance on the project. “We’re here not because we’re anti-progress,” he declared. “We’re pro-democracy.”
As Beach Erosion Accelerates, Remedies Are Costly and Few
Colin almost tripped on the doorframe as he walked in. The entrance hall, tiled in exquisite black and white marble was vast, with its ceiling soaring more than two stories overhead. A staircase curved upward, leading to a gallery above. Through open doors on his right, he could see a library appointed with dark leather furniture and shelves crammed with books. To his left, a double door was shut, showing off the grain of a dark wood he guessed was mahogany.
The remote control is designed with a LCD disply for easier and more precise operation.
He expressed surprise that the situation did not worsen considering the heavy-handed tactics used by the police.
It is unlikely that hanging bowls would have been used as lamps holding sticky substances such as wax, tallow or oil, as this would have obscured and/or damaged the internal decorations. Possibly they could have been used as lamp or candle reflectors, suspended by one of the attachment points and held at an angle behind a lamp or candle flame by means of cords or chains from the other two attachment points to a hook or hooks on the wall. The shiny surface of the metal would have reflected and intensified the light, and the coloured decorations may have reflected attractive patterns that would shift with any movement of the flame or bowl (a sort of cross between stained glass windows and a lava lamp).
For the purpose of what I have to say on the matter, let's remove from the table any discussion of tax rates, what's fair vs. not fair, whether the rich should pay a higher percentage than those at the poverty level, etc.
The saddest point of all is that Mr. Williams's ignorance expresses the ignorance of most people outside of the Church and many within.
I had my first archery lesson on Sunday as part of a series of columns I have been writing exploring the intricacies of some of the lesser-known Summer Olympic sports (believe it or not, there are more sports than swimming and gymnastics). It was a fun experience and the Santa Cruz archery range is just gorgeous.
And so we think, “It’s a jungle out there! Strangers are hiding everywhere, with duct tape. I will not let them kill my kid!”
Understanding the numerology of the Tarot is as easy as understanding your own personal associations with numbers.
vocals of foreign sounds
Pizzolato forwarded the image to the work e-mail account of Danna Morris, who was Kenner’s information technology director at the time…”Once you do that, it’s stuck in the city server,” said city attorney Keith Conley, who released the image as part of a public records request. He said it is the only such image that he knows about. Morris…abruptly resigned in April 2010 amid an investigation of computer irregularities. Mayor Mike Yenni fired Pizzolato in September…
1. When in doubt, keep writing anyway.
I find more and more employees who don’t recognize the power of good interpersonal skills. And, in the business world, interpersonal skills generally refer to an employee’s ability to get along with others, while getting the job done. An employee who listens and takes feedback has a far better chance of being highly favored. As a career coach, I know that employers want to hire a good attitude. Here are some Smart Solutions™ to improve your relational skills:
Lighting and the incense are used in the same way that I use the music. Soft lighting, like candlelight, and mellow incense, such as lotus or sandalwood, tend to help me with writing emotional scenes of love or loss. Bright or colored light (think candles in colored glass votives) and harsher smells (patchouli or frankincense) inspire the meaner scenes of fights, break-ups, or other conflicts. I tend to only use the lights and smells when I’m really stuck or really need to be inspired. Usually, if my nudge won’t budge I will also do some meditating to truly focus on my characters, their dilemmas, and my handling of their lives.
Seemples.
Later, as we were watching a tv show in which a boy shoots his mom, I yelped “What if the ninja baby tries to kill me?!” and he said “First of all, no ninja baby would use a gun, and second of all, you’d be dead.”
*Feel free to submit your list in advance (as incentive to really get those books taken care of) or to tally them as you climb.
Well before there were mobile phones carried around in a pocket or purse, there were phone booths. Small metal and glass buildings, with hinged doors, phone books (which hung below a small metal shelf), and phones inside. You'd insert a nickel, dime, or quarter (depending on the era) and dial your number on a rotary dial (later push button).
continues the last one.
*4: The mSATA 3Gb/s slot is located on mPCIe Combo™ expansion card.
OK, calm down and breathe.
Level 7: MP Cost: 20, Duration: 210 seconds, All Stats: +4%.
And if not, why not? Are you running ragged at the moment between kids, husband, and work? Maybe this is someone who wants more than he/she is saying. Someone who wants to go to lunch so she can complain about her boyfriend? Is this a male friend who constantly pushes to change the relationship? Or perhaps your mother wants to needle you into another blind date?
HABEAS CORPUS (1929) **1/2
Go and see the show if you get the chance, very interested, shows the range of workshops that will be open to the public during Spring Fling 2012.
Both Sweet Home and Clarence concluded their investigations on Monday, April 30. Although there was no admission of using a racial slur by any Clarence lacrosse player, we have determined that there is evidence to believe that the allegations of wrongdoing have merit. Additionally, the mere existence of such allegations demands that we respond accordingly.
I read once that a mother daughter relationship is tough because you see all of their faults as your own.
Then I heard someone talking really loudly in the lobby and I went out to see what was going on. Turns out this guy didn’t realize the SPCA actually makes sure you are suited to the animal you decide to adopt, and his panties were in the biggest of knots over the fact that the staff wouldn’t allow him to adopt a dog that absolutely requires a large yard and tons of exercise. He was getting so flustered and couldn’t understand why they wouldn’t allow him to take this dog to live in his apartment, and he wouldn’t even allow the girls to suggest a calmer and/or smaller dog. I’m sure the staff get dumb people like that quite often, but it amazes me that someone would consider getting a large dog if they live in an apartment, let alone get so angry about the fact that the SPCA believes it would be an unfair environment.
Alternate 1950s future tech dystopia Better alt. 1950s future tech dystopia
But anyway. Being serious. New Year's Resolution number 29: resurrect the blog. Give it the kiss of life. Prod it a bit. Write something on it, dammit!
Pulling up stumps we pushed on into Birdsville.....mmmmmm which day? What day is it again? Can't remember. Camped two nights on the lovely Diamintina River just outside of town and got ourselves stocked up again with supplies and water. Birdsville has a town water supply care of their hot bore (1700m) that also supplies their power so we were revelling in the taps with fresh water, long showers and grassy green oval (bizarre I know).
Did this organization collapse under the weight of the quake and its aftershocks? Far from it. In fact, today it is probably stronger than at any time in its history.
With respect to nurse managers and the hiring process, it would seem that the appropriate questions were not asked and little to no verification of experience was made when the aforementioned circumstances occur. We all know that anyone can fabricate a resume that looks impressive. The most difficult item in the hiring process is to really be able to tease out what a prospective employee has for experience. Reference checks offer some level of comfort for the nurse manager during the hiring process but in many instances a reference check with a previous employer can be misleading and void of the real substance a hiring manager needs to make an informed decision. Some organizations when hiring new employees will place a newly hired person in a probationary status for a number weeks to make sure that they acclimate to the organization. During that initial timeframe the employer would be evaluating the employee to make sure they fit in well. Most hospitals that I have been in do not have such a probationary period which allows an organization to redact a job offer for employees that are felt to be unworthy of employment. Another option for nurse managers during the hiring process is to use scenarios for their prospective employees to see how they would react given a clinical situation. Clearly this is a little stressful for the employee, but for an experienced nurse in any department they should be able to walk through a clinical scenario fairly well so that the nurse manager has an increased level of comfort when it comes to the new nurses skills and their ability to function.
William Marrow
Yeah, I can live with all that. In my defence though, a lot of that stuff I really need, especially the hand cream as I have been getting really dry hands and have had to suffer the indignity of borrowing hand cream off the girls at work. But with this new stuff my hands are now silky smooth and feel divine! They are all going to love me when I return and start letting them use it occasionally. I will finally be one of them.
This week our lavender plants are in bloom. I may make a lavender wand just for old time's sake, and see if I still have the knack - I got pretty good back in the old days. I want to make some lavender cookies, too. If you'd like my lavender cookie recipe, check my recipes blog, they're pretty tasty and I'll bet you can't eat just one!
A broken-song, empty words I know
28302-0449
I can draw an English comparison: Pooh Bear. Yes, I know it’s a children’s story but it’s set in a very real childhood. There’s a scene in Brautigan’s book where the guy who looks after the filling station asks one of the boys if he wants a bottle of pop:
3) I don’t use enough dialogue tags
If there was a way that I could make you understand–I wonder if you feel this way. I feel this way–wishing there was a way for us to understand each other.
the family went downtown yesterday and also, out to tybee beach! as far as they're concerned my little town is HUGE and the beach an absolute miracle of nature. you have to remember they're from a landlocked country and this trip was the first time not only outside of their country, but outside of the capital! anyway, i've asked the MITM to do a post about the field trip because i wasn't there! (i had wait for the luggage duty!)
The location: Nick and I both grew up in Princeton, NJ but had lived in New York for several years by the time we got engaged. Most of our friends and family are local so we decided in order to maximize the number of guests and ease of transportation, that we would stay local. We knew we wanted to be in New York, but weren't sure exactly where. Nick loves Brooklyn and had lived there prior to us getting engaged so when we found the Brooklyn Botanic Gardens, we thought it would be a great spot, and would show many of our friends and family a part of the city that most of our guests had never been to. We liked the idea of getting married in the city but also wanted some aspects of the wedding to be outside to capture the harvest feel of October. The gardens seemed the perfect fit.
First, day one, the old places.........
“…no one ever hated their own body, but they feed and care for their body, just as Christ does the church— for we are members of his body. “For this reason a man will leave his father and mother and be united to his wife, and the two will become one flesh.” This is a profound mystery—but I am talking about Christ and the church.” Ephesians 5:29-32
On the good side, I've heard great stuff about this other coordinator I'm sure she will be wonderful to work with as well.
By bringing up these questions with your inaction, you’ve demonstrated ineptitude of the Metro Trains variety. Sorry, I know that’s the worst insult a public transport organisation can have thrown at them, but it’s true.
“For Christ sent me not to baptize, but to preach the gospel” Isn’t it very clear just from this that the gospel that Paul preached didn’t include water baptism?
(It never fails: I publish the “definitive” collection of ancient and modern texts to honor Antinous, Hadrian, and some of the other Divi and Sancti last month, and then also publish my own “Doctor’s Edition” of the text for my own use, and already it seems obsolete–I’ve written a further long text, Adorationis Antinoi CXXXIII, and now perhaps another one honoring Hadrian will be coming about soon…Truly, it never fails!)
Our biggest problem was actually in LAX, when we were forced to purchase a ticket to Sydney on the spot, because New Zealand will not allow anyone into the country unless they have a ticket out of the country. It would have been nice to know this in advance. It is not listed on the Consul General’s website and there was no warning when we purchased our ticket.
That show was an eye opening moment for me. Deep down I have always known that I needed to let things go so we both can move on with our lives. But yes, it is easier said than done. However, that day was the beginning of actually knowing and wanting to really put things behind me and to Let It Go. I am still struggling with this but I am now consciously making efforts to release all the bad memories and pain and to just Surrender…
Start with RR for $3 (KimClark)
Pour into a loaf pan and bake in 350F for 50-60min until a cake tester comes out clean. Cool in a pan for 10min, then transfer to a cooling rack.
Mandatory Entry:
the first products i picked from theBalm were the mary lou-manizer and betty lou-manizer. both of which i really enjoy using (especially mary).
English translation by Angela Skrimshire (UK) and Wolfgang Floitgraf (USA) of Ingo Fliess’ interview with Edgar Reitz
Colombia is the second most biodiverse country on the planet. There are five geographic regions; the Andes, the Caribbean, the Pacific coast, the Amazon and the eastern plains.
we can only dream
She reiterates this in LHJ:
I doubt they would appeal to kids, but this is how I like my cookies. Classic with an unexpected twist.
Pfft. I wish.
Happy Birthday, Mabel Dodge Luhan. Luhan was a well known benefactress of the arts and was influential in the start of the Taos Art Colony. In her memoir, Intimate Memories, Luhan recounts her very colorful and well lived life, including her many bisexual affairs. Luhan played hostess to such figures as: Gertrude Stein, her brother Leo, and Stein’s partner Alice B. Toklas. D.H. Lawrence and his wife visited Luhan and her then husband in Taos–apparently it was a rather tense visit, so much so that both Lawrence and Luhan wrote about the experience.
There were about a dozen kids all up mostly around Mat and Mel's age though a couple older. Tabs was the only toddler there but another family arrived not homeschool related and she interacted with their toddler for a bit.
